[Read this before reading the story: https://pastebin.com/0epZhtZJ it's not like it's some Shakespearean masterpiece, but it will help you with the context of it, etc.]








Chapter I: Opportunity Knocks

March 7th, 1858

	A knock at the door disturbs my thoughts as I put pen to paper in a correspondence letter to a fellow writer regarding various happenings and political intrigue here in Italy. "Vieni dentro". I announce to whomever is behind the door that leads to my office. "Erm... excuse me?" The gruff voice says in a distinct southern American accent. I think to myself that it's been years since I've actually spoken English, as I live in Europe where I've either had to speak French or Italian. "Oh sorry, come on in." What meets my visage as the door swings open with a creak is a short, portly Bulldog beast-man; or anthro - short for anthropomorphic as they refer to themselves, walks in with a slow, wide gait. He is dressed in what I would assume is his best suit, although his stomach protrudes from his undershirt, with buttons straining, I notice. He gives me a bow, as he takes off his top hat, revealing a receding light brown hairline underneath.
	"Good day Mr. Galliano, I am John Tavern, I work for the agricultural department in the state of Virginia, and I have come all the way from America to tell you about some news that might be of interest to you." He says with a slow drawl. "Could this not have been done through the mail?" I ask with a disinterested look on my face. "'fraid not good sir, it'd take just about as long to send a letter across the Atlantic as it would to come here; and I had no earthly clue where your estate was, so I figured it'd be best to meet you, Mr. Galliano." 
	"Well it must be important then if you took the time to come all the way to Europe. Go ahead and take a seat and I'll hear you out." The rotund bulldog has a look of relief on his muzzle as he slowly waddles over to the chair opposite of me behind my cluttered desk with various letters and manuscripts strewn about. "Thank you sir. Now down to business - since you've been here in Italy for the past twelve years, many things have changed over in America. The owners of a tobacco plantation down in Virginia whom you are related to have passed away. They had no children, and therefore no heirs to it. Where you come in, is after doing a lot of digging in the record books, the owner was in fact your uncle."
	He was right, this was quite the shock to me. My father back home in Boston had never mentioned having a brother, or any extended family past him, as my mother had died when I was born. Though he spent most of his time getting drunk at the bar so it's not a surprise he never told me about family. The thought of my father leaves me ill humored and there's no doubt it's written on my face. "So what you're getting at is there's a tobacco plantation back in Virginia, and I'm the only one alive who can claim it." I state matter-of-factly. 
	"Yessir, If you don't sign the deed to the land saying that it is yours, then the state will take the land and the slaves that are on it, and put it up for auction." Slaves. The way he said it like it was just something that's commonplace is one of the many reasons why I left the United States. Although most people, even over here in Europe barely see the kind of anthros that are used as slaves as people, the practice of enslaving insect anthros had been outlawed in all the major European powers many years ago. The ethical question of literally owning another sentient life wasn't one I was really interested in pondering.
	"I'm sorry for you having to go through all the trouble of coming over here Mr Tavern, but I'm a writer, not a planter, so I don't really see how much use a tobacco plantation would be to me." Mr. Tavern lets out a slight chuckle as if what I said was humorous and says "My good man! you'll be owning the plantation, not working it! that's what the bugs are there for don'tcha know?" His attitude towards this like he was simply handing me a wheat farm, instead of a place with real people was starting to aggravate me. The stories that made their way over here of runaway slave insects escaping here to Europe were horrific. Torture, rape, murder, all seemed to be common occurrences on southern plantations, especially the larger ones that had thousands of insects working them.
	But the more I mulled over the idea in my head, it seemed possible that I could turn this into something positive. My career as a writer would still be possible in America, and with the money I have I could give the insects stuck there a decent life not as slaves, but as workers and treat them well. I let out a long sigh. "Mr. Tavern, after thinking it over, I think I will sign that deed and will move back home to America." I say with a half-smile on my face. The short bulldog jumps out of his chair, wide eyed with an even wider smile on his scrunched up wrinkly face. "Mr Galliano, you will not regret your choice, and I think you'll see your life become much easier!." He says shaking my hand with his small paw. I wonder if this is genuine enthusiasm from him or if he's happy he doesn't have to deal with this mess anymore and has given it some other poor sap. That poor sap being me.

Chapter II: Homecoming

May 20th, 1858

	The wagon that's carrying me and all of my chests filled with clothes, manuscripts, books, and many other things from my life in Italy that I could bring with me on a ship comes to a stop. The horse anthro that shuttled me over here from the port let's out a loud whinny and then says in a deep booming voice "Mr Galliano, we're at your new home." When I get out to look at where we've stopped, I see a large black iron gate with the name "FOLSOM" in bold letters along the top of the gate doorway. I wonder why my uncle changed our family name as I examine it. Maybe they don't like Italians down here. The gate doesn't appear to be locked, so I unhook the latch and open it up, and see about a half-mile's worth of tobacco fields in my view, and a large white mansion in the middle. Along with several tiny tin shacks, I presume are the slave quarters, leaving me with a pit in my stomach. 
	"I can take ya down to the house there Mr. Galliano, won't take more than a few minutes." The large stallion says, interrupting my thoughts. "Oh - uh, yeah that'd be great, thank you." I get back in the wagon and after about ten minutes, we stop and once again I drop down out of the wagon.
	The stallion anthro graciously helps me unload all my belongings from the wagon, showing his strength by lifting chests like they were as light as feathers, and making me feel quite inadequate as a man. We finish putting everything at the foot of the marble staircase that leads up to the front door of the mansion. As soon as we're done, I give him a generous tip for helping out, he bids me farewell, and carries his wagon off and away from the property. 
	As I carry all of the chests up to the front door, I wonder if plantations are always this quiet. In my mind I figured there would be hundreds of insect-men toiling away in the fields, with anthros of different species holding whips, waiting to lash out at any bug that wasn't working hard enough in their eyes. But the place seemed totally desolate. There was an eeriness to it all; without actually seeing what an average day on a plantation looked like, I was only left to my imagination, and what I saw in my mind's eye wasn't pleasant.
	I shook the thoughts of the nastiness of plantation work out of my head and appraised my new abode. Four giant Roman styled pillars held up the porch of the house, to the left and to the right of the mansion were various shrubs and brush to give it a sense of liveliness, although they looked like they hadn't been cared for in a while. The house itself was huge, three stories tall, the deed said it was over 20,000 square feet and had forty-four rooms in all, with multiple brick chimneys sticking out the top. It was fucking big, to put it bluntly. And the more I thought about it, the more it seemed like a headache than a blessing, thinking of all the maintenance that was going to need to go into it. I thought maybe I might have been in over my head when I signed the deed of ownership, as I've been used to living in a small but comfortable townhouse not even a quarter of this size in a port city in Italy. 
	After taking in the scope of the house I decided that I needed to see if the inside was as barren as the land surrounding it. So with an unsure hand, I grabbed the large worn copper doorknocker and knocked three times. After several tense seconds, nothing happened. So I knocked again. Same result, no answer. I sighed and thought that I would have to find some way through a window as the giant doors were locked, when suddenly, the ten foot monolith groaned as it opened, letting me know that I was not alone here.
	What greets me in the doorway of the house startled me at first. It was a spider anthro; more specifically, a tarantula upon closer inspection, as I see brown fur cover its limbs. Although I detest slavery, I don't know how much better I am as insect-men still give me quite a fright with their looks, and chitin, and oddly colored eyes. This one in particular is noticeably female with how she is dressed in a simple grey working blouse that covers her large, and frankly impressive figure. She towers over me at what I guess to be seven feet in height, she has her arms folded as she looks down at me, apparently not very impressed at what she sees, with all her green eyes glaring at me. "Can I help you?" She says in a judgmental sounding tone. Her voice is deep but still feminine, her mouth is frowning as she looks down at me while her...things that are on the sides of her mouth seem to move independently. 
	I frantically fish out the deed from my pocket and hand it to her. I clear my throat- "Uhm, my name is Adrian Galliano and I just found out that my uh, uncle died recently and that I'm now the owner of this estate." The spider-lady looks at me, then back at the deed. "Just because I'm a bug, don't mean I'm dumb, Sweetheart, I can read." She says with a smirk in her face. 
	"O-oh sorry" I say while looking at my feet in embarrassment. She then breaks the awkward silence, "Anyhow, So you're the new master then huh? Well then, my name is Shelly, I'm the head maid of the house, it's a pleasure to welcome you home, master. Sorry we got off on the wrong foot." She give's a slight curtsy with her front pair of legs and bows her head slightly, her pony tail of dark brown hair falling from her bonnet. Her demeanor shifts to that of what one would expect from a maid: bright, and pleasant, which seemed odd coming from a giant spider, but I could leave my biases and phobias at the front door as I entered the house.

Chapter III: Good House Keeping

	As Shelly led me through the foyer, I soon found out that we wouldn't be the only two here. I saw a bee-anthro wearing an apron over her plain looking blouse working in the kitchen on something that smelled sweet to the point of being sickly and when we made...eye contact? I couldn't really tell since her eyes were large black ovals, but she blinked and looked startled as Shelly and I made our way to the kitchen. "Master, this is Minnie, she's our cook, and a mighty fine one if I do say so myself." Shelly said with a bright smile. 
	"H-hello master..." The bee-girl said as her words hung in the air. She wasn't nearly as tall as Shelly, several inches shorter than I even, maybe around 5'6"ish. Along with what you expect from a bee, she had two pairs of arms, which she put two good use as she stirred two pots with her top pair, and was cutting up some kind of fruit with her bottom pair. She had black hair that was done in a french braid, and her translucent wings were folded neatly behind her as she worked. Minnie was much easier to look at than Shelly, although Shelly made up for it with her warm demeanor. I noticed that Minnie also had a tuft of white fluff around her neck, which added to her soft, kind look. 
	As we left Minnie to continue cooking, we made our way through the first floor of the house. The parlor, much like rest of the house, was huge. An open room with a window to look out at the open fields. There were plenty of chairs and couches, laid out for gentlemen and socialites to bullshit about whatever mundane topic's on their mind. Shelly then led me through to the dining hall, which was easily the biggest room in the house. Two ornate chandeliers hung from the ceiling, and below them was a dinner table was so long, that it had what looked to be fifty chairs surrounding it.
	As we made our way up the stairs to the next floor of the house, Shelly broke the silence "Ya don't say much do ya, Master?" Then bent down to whisper in my ear as we got to the top of the hallway. "Or do we frighten you that much?" My heart skipped a beat when she said that. Was it really that obvious I was scared of them? "N-no it's just that I'm not used to being around insect-anthros, at least when I lived in Europe." Shelly looked at me wide-eyed at what I said. "You used to live in Europe, Master?"
	"Yeah, I got on a boat for Italy when I was sixteen, and ended about becoming a writer." She turned her head to look at me as we walked, it was becoming a lot easier to look at her as we talked. "Heh, that explains the accent, it's like part Yankee, part somethin' else. So what madeya wanna come back to America then? certainly it wasn't a rundown plantation where most of the bugs have left."  
	So that's why the place felt like a ghost town. As soon as my uncle died, all the workers left to hopefully find someplace better than working in a hot field all day. I can't really say I blame them... "Master, ya still with me?"
	"Oh sorry!. Uh, I left because I can still write here in the U.S., my publisher's actually based in New York. And well, I kinda felt obligated to takeover since If I didn't, who knows who the state would sell it to, could be some freak who takes enjoyment in abusing his...workers." Shelly looked at me as if she wasn't sure how to process what I said. "So you pitied our situation then huh? Well that is pretty nice of ya, but we got treated fairly I think, at least those of us that worked in the house. The bugs in the fields, they don't get any pity from no one."
	"I can see why they left then." I said as we made our way to what looks like a piano room, since it had well, a piano. And several chairs to lounge in and enjoy the music. "Hmmph, they'da been better off just stayin' here. Running away they're likely to just get shot by the Sheriff or someone else. Or rounded up and end up doin' the same thing they were here." She looked away, her mood dampening at what she said. "Might as well head to the next floor. Ain't nothin' else down here except storage which prolly won't interest you much." I nodded in agreement as we started up to the next staircase which led presumably to the floor where all the bedrooms would be. 		 
 	When we were about halfway up the stairs, music could be heard playing from the piano in the room we'd just left minutes ago. Specifically, Bach's Toccata and Fugue in D minor, I could tell as I played a bit of piano myself, but not nearly as well as whoever was down there. "Ah that damned girl I thought I told her to finish cleanin'..." Shelly grumbled in frustration as she shuffled her six legs back down the staircase. 
	I followed in stride to see who the mysterious piano playing 'girl' was. The piece was stopped abruptly and then I heard the muffled voice of Shelly accosting whoever this girl was and made my way into the room. When Shelly saw me enter she halted her stern talking-to and sighed. 
	"Master, this ornery little thing is Alice, she's the other maid." Alice was what looked to be a moth-anthro because of her grey skin(?) color and fuzzy hairs all over her. She looked even fuzzier than Minnie, and looked to be shorter as well. Her eyes looked softer too, and she had short white hair tied in a bun. When she saw me in the doorway she gave a small wave with her top left hand but said nothing. "You're really good at piano, that's one of my favorite Bach pieces too." I said, giving the small moth-girl a smile. Her antennae perked up when she heard this and she also smiled, and in what sounded like it was no louder than a whisper said "Thank you." 
	"Now go finish sweepin' downstairs like I toldya alright?" Shelly said to Alice. The moth-girl nodded then left the room, and went down the stairway opposite of the one we were headed up to. 
	"Ya gotta be careful with that one." Shelly said presumably referring to Alice. "She's ornery, but not in the normal sense, ya gotta keep an eye on her since she tends to wander."
	"She's very talented when it comes to playing piano though." 
	"Yeah, your aunt taught her how to play for a few years before she caught Consumption an' passed. She always liked Alice, although she didn't care for any other bug. Kinda saw her as her daughter in a way." 
	"I wouldn't mind hearing her play more often, I play a little bit myself, and I could probably learn something from her." Shelly smirked at that. "You're quite the Renaissance Man then, Master. An' you don't gotta ask me, you're the one in charge." I didn't really feel in charge if I was being perfectly honest. Shelly seemed to know her way around here well enough, and I felt like I'd be deferring to her knowledge for a while. Something lingered in my mind though, always being called "Master". It didn't sit right with me. Hell, even being called 'sir' was odd. 
	"You don't have to call me 'Master' Shelly. You can just call me Adrian." I said as we made our way to the door at the end of the hall. She stopped right before opening the door. "That'd be a bit uncouth of me don'tcha think? Master...Adrian." 
	"Well I guess you can call me whatever you're comfortable with, but it's just a little weird being called a master... and it's little weird that I 'own' people. So I guess I'm trying to make it feel like you just work for me...y'know?" I felt like I was rambling at this point and that what I was saying wasn't making much sense, but Shelly gave an understanding nod. "That's very kind and considerate of ya, Master Adrian. I think you'll do just fine with that kinda attitude." Shelly's words made me feel somewhat better about the situation, although I don't know if I'd ever get over owning 'slaves'. She then broke up my train of thought once we'd entered the master bedroom.
	"Well, here's where you'll be stayin', it's the biggest room and definitely the nicest." It certainly was nice and if I had to venture to guess it was about as big my townhouse in Italy, at least by square footage. The bed was a king size and had what looked to be satin sheets draped over it. The vanity was as big as my work desk, with a mirror. The room had a closet that took up an entire wall, and opposite of the closet was two French doors that opened out leading to a balcony.
	"Yeah I think this will work. I just need to get my luggage up here and-" "Oh don't worry about! I'll round up the two outside and we'll get you situated, Master Adrian." Two more? was there really only five people here before I showed up? I'll find out here shortly I suppose...

Chapter IV - Moving In

	Once we had made our way back downstairs, Shelly went outside to round up the 'other two' whoever they were. While I waited in the foyer, Minnie walked up behind me and lightly tapped me on the shoulder. I turned around and the bee-girl was holding a glass of some kind of brown liquid. "W-would you like some tea, Master?"
	"Oh wow, uh yeah, thank you, Minnie." I beamed. As I took the glass from her, I saw there was some kind of scar on her right arm, it looked like a deep cut of some kind, and I wonder if that's why she had been so skittish around me so far. Thinking about that left me quite crestfallen. But the tea was still very good. Slightly sweet, with a hint of lemon. "This is really good, Minnie!" She seems to cheer up at my comment, and headed back to the kitchen.
	I walk outside onto the marble porch and see that Shelly's making her way back to the house, with two figures in tow behind her, both walking on two legs. As they made their way up the stairs, I noticed one of the them was a butterfly-anthro, as she had orange wings with black spots on them. Their color made me wonder if it was a Monarch butterfly, as the wings were beautiful, and really stood out. It was also wearing overalls, with a white shirt underneath, and a straw hat on its head with holes for it's antennae to poke out. 					As I looked the insect-person up and down I figured out that much like every other resident of the house I'd met so far, she was also female. With the large bust that jutted out of her shirt and overalls, giving even Shelly a run for her money, and her face was quite feminine, she looked at me with a bright smile, she had orange hair that was the same color of her wings, and white eyes with eyelashes even. Her feeler...things on her mouth I almost didn't see as they were black like the rest of her head, but did contrast against her grey, full lips.
	The other was much the opposite of the butterfly-woman. It was a red wasp-anthro that looked to be about an inch or two taller than me, and was wearing a button-up shirt that field workers would wear, along with pants that hugged tightly to its legs. Slung over the shoulder of the wasp, who, also was a female, was a hunting rifle. Her chest was smaller than the butterfly's and certainly Shelly's, but fit the figure of her athletic build. 
	...It also occurred to me that I should probably stop thinking about the ladies' chests if I was going to be a proper estate owning gentleman. Her face also contrasted the butterfly-anthro's, as she wore a definite frown and her feeler-things looked a lot like teeth, but on the outside of her mouth. Her black eyes glared at me in a similar way that Shelly had when she first saw me, but the wasp-woman did it in a  "I'm pissed off that I'm seeing you" kind of way. Her black hair was the shortest of all the ladies of the estate, done in a pixie-cut.
	"Master Adrian, these are the other two bugs that stayed along. The wasp's Josie, and Ms.Butterfly here is Esther. They're a big part of why we've been able to survive out on our own, Josie hunts, and Esther's our gardener."
	"Nice to meet you, Master Adrian." Esther said with a bright smile a wave. Her voice was as cheery as she looked, almost having a sing-songy sound to it. The wasp known as Josie did not greet me, instead going to pick a couple of my chests full of clothes and other belongings and simply asked "Where are these going?" Her voice was raspy but still feminine, if a bit monotone.
	After getting all of my belongings up to my bedroom, the sun was setting and Shelly alerted me that it was time for dinner. As I sat at in my chair at the head of the table I noticed none of others were sitting down to eat. When Shelly brought out my food, I couldn't help but catch a peak at her well endowed bust, although I immediately chastised myself for doing so as it's impolite, and because well... she's not human. My head is cleared by the Fine China in front of me; holding a venison steak with carrots and potatoes that smelled amazing as the steam rose up off the plate. "Shelly, this looks amazing but... where's everyone else?" The spider-maid frowned and said "What..you want us to sit here with you?" I was flabbergasted to say the least, and the look was plastered on my face. "Well I mean, yeah! of course I do. You all have been so helpful and great to me. Plus it'd feel a little weird, and lonely, sitting in this giant dining hall all by myself. Shelly smiled, and her eight green eyes misted a little bit, although I'm not sure why. "I'll fetch the rest of the girls an' see if Minnie's got enough for all of us. You're a sweetheart, Master Adrian." 
	Eventually Shelly did gather everyone and all six of us sat at the table. They all looked uncomfortable sitting there, this was probably the first time they ever sat at the dining hall table. Shelly sat adjacent to me on my left although she didn't sit in a chair as she wouldn't fit, she kind of rested on her legs. Alice sat next to her and like Shelly said, looked spaced-out at the table looking at the bright chandelier. Esther sat across from them on my right, while Josie sat seemingly as far away as she could from me. After getting everyone's food together, Minnie sat next to me on my right. After about five minutes of everyone eating in awkward silence, Shelly broke awkward tension.
	"So Master Adrian, what are your books about?" All the ladies, even Josie, looked at me with curiosity about what I write about. "Umm... well I started out writing children's short stories after fighting against the Austrians in Venice-
	"YOU were in a war?" Josie interrupted. Shelly glared at her but said nothing, and everyone now looked at me with even more interest. I sighed. "It wasn't really a war, but a fight for independence against the Austrians and Nothern Italians that controlled most of Italy, one part being Sicily, where I was living at the time." They all continued to look, wide-eyed, and wanting more. I guess everyone loves a good war story, even though mine wasn't pretty.

Chapter V - Viva La Revolution

July 24th, 1848 - Custoza, Venice

	I was abruptly awakened by the sound of gunfire, and roughly shook by paws. "Adrian! What the hell are you doing sleeping?! We need to get the fuck back out there!" The paws and voice belonged to my friend Guido, a fox-man from Sardinia, and the man who had convinced me to join the Italian army and fight against the northerners and the Austrians, and for rights that I enjoyed back in the country I was born in, America.
	I buttoned up my jacket, grabbed my hat and rifle, and followed Guido out of the foxhole. We were greeted by sounds of artillery cannons, gunfire, and and screams of both human and beast-men alike. The corps we were in was one of two that the King of Sardinia had fielded to fight for independence against the Austrians. Our task was to flank their position, which was successful and we caught them totally off guard. After getting filed in rank, we fought on the front line, after firing our rifles, we ran to the Austrians to fight them head-on with our bayonets, them doing the same. When I was in the moment of battle, I didn't feel like I was in my body. I didn't feel like I was the one who stabbed an Austrian human, saw his guts and blood spill out of his midsection as I had disemboweled him. I also didn't see the wolf-anthro man behind me try to do the same, but luckily, Guido had gotten him before he got me. We looked at each other, he yelled "lucky bastard" and we pressed on. 
	By the time the sun had gone down, everyone's spirits were high. We had just captured the village of Staffalo. Some men were singing songs, others enjoying food, some sat in the medic tents being cared for - I saw a monkey-anthro with half of his left leg missing having to be carried out on a stretcher.
	But all I could do, was sit. Staring at a fire one of the boys had started, all I could see in my head was the man I killed, seeing his face as he died. Wondering whether or not he had a family, how long it'd take them to find out their father wasn't coming home. Before we had ventured to Custoza, fighting seemed like the right thing to do, why shouldn't southern Italians have the same rights as northerners, be able to vote for their leaders like people could in America? Why shouldn't they be ruled by someone who was from their country and not by a foreigner? But after today, I wasn't so sure if war was the right answer. That man's face as he died by my hand played over and over as I stared at the fire until I felt a paw clap my shoulder and I was brought back to reality. "What the fuck are you doin' just sittin' their starin' mate? Do you not know what we just did? We just beat the fuckin' Austrians! We're finally gonna have it here like you do in America! Does that not excite you!?" 
"I don't know." 
	"I don't know-what the FUCK do you mean ya don't know ya silly bastard?! What-you're down cause ya stabbed that Kraut-fuck? Ya don't think he was gonna do the same thing to you? his fuckin' buddy was about to before Kraut Slayer Guido Moltinari came and saved the day!" I gave a halfhearted smile and said "Okay, you're right but still, I think I'm gonna turn in early tonight." 
	"Fine by me- but hey, remember this, this is only the beginning mate, this our 'shot heard 'round the world' and we're gonna get our fuckin' country back!"

July 25th, 1848

	I don't know how, but I was blessed with sleep that night. But like the one prior, I was abruptly awakened by my furry pawed friend. "Shit-SHIT A-Adrian those fucks they brought more troops! S-shit we're surrounded c'mon mate we gotta go!" Go? I didn't know where we were going to go. I didn't know which way was up and which was down. As I got my bearings straight, I knew that I was in a village called Staffalo, and when I looked at what surrounded me, all I could see were the colors of the Austrian Empire's army.
	The fighting didn't last long. After being surrounded on both sides, most people either fled, or were killed. Guido and I ended up getting captured by the Austrians, where we were currently being held prisoner in a shack somewhere I think outside of Venice. There were two others with us, although I didn't know them by name. What the Austrians wanted from us I didn't know either, although the men holding us captive looked like they were in the same rough shape we were. I somehow got out of the battle mostly unscathed, except for a bayonet that nicked my foot and hurt like hell, along with bleeding. Guido on the other hand wasn't fairing as well, he'd been shot in the shoulder, and because of his fiery temper and loud mouth, got his his left ear cut off by one of the Austrians holding us captive. I believe it happened after he told a Raven-anthro Austrian man that he was going to "rape his mother to death once he got out of here". 
	My guess as to why they kept us here was for revenge and to torture us, and to our misfortune, I was correct. My German wasn't perfect, but I overheard something about "letting those Italian fucks have it" before they departed in the next few days. They started out by simply kicking all four of us as hard as they could, none of us made little noise, except the fiery Sardinian fox. I don't remember what he said, but knowing Guido it was something that would piss them off pretty good and one of the Austrians kicked him right in the snout which eventually got him to stop speaking, probably because the kick broke his jaw. As we were all hogtied, all we could do was squirm as they beat on us. I tried to think of anything else as I felt the stinging pain of one my ribs break from a particularly strong kick from a cat-anthro, but all I could think of was the man I killed, and that I was paying for my sin. Eventually they either got bored or their commanding officer had come to speak with them and they stopped some time in the evening. The only sounds I heard were grunts and heavy pained breathing coming from all of us. I smelled blood and piss, but I wasn't sure who's it was, although one of us probably pissed ourselves just from nature calling, and I know we all bled at some point during the ordeal. 
	Around midnight I heard Guido say my name quietly, as it pained him to speak. "Mmm?" I grunted, myself too tired to make actual syllables. "If this is how I die...I'll know that I died for my country and my countrymen...and I'm fine with that."

July 28th, 1848

	The beatings continued, and eventually the Austrians found more creatively insidious ways to pass their time with us as they waited for their next order. One such was where they would take our heads and hold them in a bucket of water for about a minute or so, to the point of drowning would set in. After doing this five or six times, eventually I became so worn out that I stopped fighting back and just let myself drown. But instead of gifting me death they pulled my head back out and I got a kick to the stomach rendering me unconscious. When I awoke I didn't know what time it was, I didn't know what day it was or how long we'd been held captive, even though it'd only been three days. I found out to my horror that while I was out, the raven-anthro had decided to castrate Guido after his remark of raping the raven's mother, and when I saw the mess that was my friend Guido, it looked nothing like him. He was totally despondent, that fire had been extinguished in him and he was only a man awaiting death. 
	The Austrians informed us that we'd be lined up and executed by a firing squad, and left in a shallow grave before they would depart. And with that knowledge, I laid my head back down on the dirt floor of the shack, knowing it would be the last time I would sleep.

July 29th, 1848

	What greeted me at daybreak was not the Austrians with guns in tow, eagerly awaiting to be rid of us before they departed the outskirts of Venice, but was the same Austrians that had been torturing us for fun, now untying us. I looked on in confusion, not sure what was happening as I was coming back to the waking world, but then one of the Austrians, a human announced to us in broken Italian:
"The Pope has declared a cease-fire between southern Italy and Austria, as he does not want two Catholic nations to fight each other, you're free to go." And with that, they all left the shack.
	I wasn't sure if I should be ecstatic that I'd been given a second lease on life, or feel despair at being denied the sweet release of death. I was eventually able to stand up, as were the other two soldiers that were with me. I then looked down at Guido who wasn't moving. I shook Guido as hard as my body could muster, told him it was time to go, but he did nothing. I couldn't hear him breath, I didn't want to believe it. I continued to slap his body, trying to wake him, I yelled, I cried like I had never cried before. But nothing woke him, my friend, the Sardinian fox Guido Multisonti, was dead.

Chapter VI - Dinner Party

	When I finished regaling my story of fighting in Italy, it definitely set a dark mood on the dinner table. Minnie was crying, Shelly looked down but not really at anything in particular, Josie looked away as well, although she seemed shaken by what she heard. And Esther and Alice both looked like they'd just seen a ghost.
	I felt terrible for rattling the ladies as badly as my tale had, but they wanted to know, so I let them. Eventually Josie spoke up once again. "What...what did you do after they let you out?" 
	"The three of us ended up burying Guido. One of them was also from Sardinia, and promised me he'd let Guido's family know their son died proudly for his country. After that, I found a human couple that graciously let me stay with them for a few weeks, fed me, and the man let me work on his farm for a while. After telling them what I told you all, he said I needed to let my story be known, to write it down. For a while I didn't, and after getting back on my feet, I only wrote children's stories, because I wanted to get my mind as far as possible from war." 
	"But, eventually I relented and did write it down, and after getting it published, the book sold a lot of copies in Italy and made me a small fortune. And now, here I am in front of you all" I said, trying my best to give a small smile.
	"So...you were once a slave as well, Master?" Alice said in her small whispered voice. "I guess you could say that, yes I was a slave for a short while. Perhaps that's what I hate it so much and why I could never put you all through any of the things I went through in Venice. I know I've only been here a day, but I promise you all that I will never hurt any of you." That seemed to cheer them all up and lighten the mood. Afterwards Minnie got up to get dessert, some strawberries that Esther had grown. The table now wasn't so quiet, with the ladies talking among each other. 
	I excused myself from to get situated in my bedroom. Once in my room, I looked at myself in the mirror. My short, brown hair was disheveled and in desperate need to be cut. My brown eyes had bags under them. My face was unshaven and stubbly. My skin was pale white from my sedentary in-door lifestyle as a writer, and my naked chest was covered in scars from those days in Venice. I looked like shit. I suppose retelling my story took a lot out of me as well, but I couldn't dwell on the past anymore. I was now starting a new life, a happier life away from misery and with five amazing ladies that I planned to treat as favorably as I could.

*knock* *knock* *knock*

	My inner monologue was disturbed by rapping on my bedroom door. I quickly threw on a nightshirt and went to see who was at the door. When I opened it, I was greeted by my towering spider-maid Shelly. The next thing I knew I was off the ground, and was in a vice grip hug with my face in between her very large bosom. "Thankya for tellin' us all of that Sweetheart." She says to me in a soft voice.
"Mo frromlem" I muttered while my face was stuck in its very soft prison. Shelly giggled and put me down, kissed me on the forehead, which also involved her fuzzy feelers rubbing against my head, which tickled. 
	"Good night, Master Adrian" She said in a low hushed tone. I also said good night and she scuttled away. I then retired to bed. Before I drifted off to sleep I thought to myself that I could probably get used to this new life.

Chapter VII - The Day Begins

May 21st, 1858

	I peacefully awoke from my slumber fully rested in what felt like the first time in many, many years. Hell, if I can get sleep like this every night, it was worth moving here just for that. As I walked to the bathroom, I was still amazed that this house not only had plumbing to it, but the bathroom had faucets for hot and cold water. Just how goddamn loaded was my uncle in the first place? I pondered that as I bathed in the massive porcelain tub so big, it could easily fit Shelly. 
	After rinsing off, I headed downstairs as it smelled like Minnie was cooking up something good for breakfast. As I headed for the dining hall, Shelly and Alice went upstairs to clean my clothes. Though I said I could help out, Shelly insisted they do it. Josie and Esther were both busy with their chores outside, leaving Minnie and I alone. 
	Once again, Minnie did not disappoint when it came to food; bringing out a plate of ham and eggs, with a glass of freshly squeezed orange juice. I graciously thanked her for the meal. But again, like the beginning of dinner last night, was feeling lonely eating in this giant dining hall all by myself. I walked over to the kitchen where Minnie looked like she had just started cleaning.
	"Hey Minnie, have you eaten yet?" She startles at hearing my voice and looks up at me with a surprised expression. "Oh! Master. Uh, no I haven't eaten yet I was going to after cleaning the dishes here." 
	"Well if you don't mind it'd be nice to have someone to sit down and eat with at the table if that's alright with you?" I ask with a slight smile. 
	"N-no that's no problem at all! I'll fix up a plate and be there in a minute." Soon after, Minnie walks into the dining hall and sits right next to me. Looking at her up close, she really is a cute girl, with the way she does her hair in a braid and how her antennae dance around on the top her head. All the ladies were beginning to grow on me.
	After enjoying Minnie's quiet company, I decided I'd ask the question that had been nagging at me regarding her. "Minnie, if you don't mind me asking, how did you get that nasty scar on your arm there?" After hearing me Minnie's antennae droop, and her smile fades into a frown. Shit - this wasn't the right time to ask this goddammit... 
	"The old head cook that worked here back when Master Folsom was alive, she was a mean old hound named Ethel, and every time I'd make even the smallest mistake she'd grab a metal spoon, put it in a pot of hot water for a few seconds, and hit me with it. She hit the same spot so many times it just ended up being....this." Pointing to her arm.
	"Jesus Minnie that's awful. Even though my situation in Venice wasn't the same, I think I can relate." She looked at me as I raised my shirt to show her my ribs. I could hear her gasp as she saw the big dark blue-black scar I had from when I got my ribs cracked. 
	"Master..Adrian you didn't have to show me that, I believed you last night when you said you wouldn't hurt us." Her voice cracks slightly as she says this, like she was about to start crying like she did after I told my horror story. What a sweet girl, anyone who would ever want to hurt her deserves a special place in Hell. I gave her a side hug with my right arm and am surprised to see her nuzzle into my neck a little bit, feeling the soft fuzziness of the white tuft around her neck along with the hardness of the chitin that made up her skin. "Thanks Minnie. That means a lot that you trust me." We stay like this for a minute, then I get up to put my plate back in the kitchen.
	"Wait Master, let me get that." Minnie flutters over with her wings to me and grabs my plate to clean it. "Hey, I can help you out back here when it comes to cleaning if you'd like, I figured I'd take a few days to get situated before I started writing." Minnie cutely giggles at what I say. "Master, that's awfully generous of you, I'd love it if you'd help me clean."
	And clean we did, washing out all the plates, silverware, and glasses that had been used for breakfast, all in all taking a good half an hour. By the time Minnie and I finished in the kitchen, I went upstairs to find the maids. 
	Alice and Shelly were both dusting the window sills on the third as I made my way through the hallway. What struck me as odd, along with many other things in this house, was that there were a good ten other rooms in here besides mine, but none of the women of the house seemed to be taking advantage of them. Were they living in those tin shanties outside?  If they were, it wasn't gonna be for long, as there's no reason with how damn huge this place is.
	I went into one of the rooms that was closest to me in the hallway, and as I went around inspecting it, it was totally empty. Aside from a bed and a dresser, the room had no personal touches to it at all. Although it was barren, it was still a nice room, and I imagined that the other nine bedrooms were similar. 
	While busy with my inspection of the room, I suddenly felt large, hard, and fuzzy hands on my shoulders and nearly jumped out of my skin in terror. As I turned around, what greeted me was Shelly with a huge grin on her face.
	"Jeez Master Adrian, ya look like ya just saw yer ghost or somethin, whatsamatter~?" She said facetiously. After taking a few seconds to calm down at the sight of the spider-maid, I explained to her how I was going through the empty bedrooms because it made me wonder where the ladies' sleeping quarters were.
	"Well, Minnie, Alice and I all sleep in the slaves quarters in the basement, Esther sleeps in her cabin by the orchard, and who the  knows where Josie stays, probably in a tree or somethin' to be alone."
	"I was wondering if it's not too much of a hassle then, If you all want to...you can move up here, you don't have to sleep in the basement, especially when there's plenty of room."
	Shelly once again showed me that warm smile of her's that I was started to grow pretty fond of. "Well aren't you just butterin' us up then Master Adrian. I guess it would be nice to have my own room...are ya sure that's alright with ya and we wouldn't bother you er nothin'...?"
	"Of course not. If we've got these bedrooms, might as well put them to good use." Shelly then got Alice to move along with her, and with Minnie, the three of them began moving their belongings up to the top floor. It took some convincing from Shelly, but I eventually got her to let me help them move their stuff as well. Alice picked the room directly to the left of mine, Minnie picked the one that was right by her's, and Shelly took the one to my left that could fit her, as it had two French doors instead of one main door. I'm not sure why my uncle had one room like it, but I'm sure Shelly's grateful for it, and so am I.
	After everyone got their room's in order, Minnie headed back down to the kitchen to get started on lunch. Alice was dusting her room off, so I went to inquire Shelly about something that was on my mind. "Hey Shelly, do you have a minute?"
	"What's on your mind, Sweetheart?"
	"Since you know how things go on here better than I do, I was wondering about Josie. Does she just...not like me?"
Shelly looks off to the side slightly as I ask her, I wonder if this was a topic she was expecting I'd ask. "I don't think it's that she dislikes you in particular, she just doesn't like humans at all. Or other anthros besides bugs. She doesn't trust 'em."
	"Is there any reason to it, or is that just how she is?" I ask, genuinely wanting to know if my behavior's been the cause of Josie's distrust.
	"Let's just say she's had it pretty rough out here before you got here, some of it's her own fault, but most of the time it ain't. I'd ask her myself if I was you, it'd be rude to gossip behind her back." Shelly was right. I should ask Josie myself about what happened to her, or at least be able to start a dialogue with her and have a cordial relationship like I felt I had with all the other ladies. 
	"Good luck getting her to open up to ya though, she's got a hundred foot brick wall between her an' the rest of the world. I've tried to talk to her many times...But who knows, maybe you got what it takes, Master Adrian."
	After lunch, I went up to the second floor to the piano room. I'm by no means a master pianist, but I knew a few pieces, and saw on that by the piano were several sheets of music. While playing through a few scales, I saw something enter my peripheral view and turned my head to see the moth-maid Alice. When I turned my head to see her she disappeared from the doorway after being caught. "Hi Alice!" I called out to her as she hid from the doorway, and she slowly made her to the piano room. "Hi..." She said in a small voice, her greeting floating in the air. She shuffled into the piano room and I waved for her to come over and play something. A little cagey at first, she sat down and started playing something from memory.
	I didn't know what it was, but it was a very beautiful piece, as pretty as Alice was. I stood up while watching her play, and admired her physique; her wings were light grey as the rest of her, although they each had dark circles on them almost like a pair of eyes. Her frame was the meekest of all the ladies here, but she was very cute nonetheless...
	I once again mentally flagellate myself for appraising the women here like they're cuts of meat. How does that not make me any worse than every other slave masters? I shift my focus on Alice's playing once more. How she plays is interesting, using all four of her arms play the sixteenth notes of the piece, her playing looks much slower than it actually is thanks to her having two more arms than the piece was more than likely intended for use. 
	After finishing the piece, I give her a small applause which she looks down at smiles slightly as if she were blushing. Can insects blush? I'm not sure, but I thank her for her playing and ask her if she'd be willing to teach me what she knows about playing piano, which she said she'd do happily. 
	By the middle of the afternoon, I make my way outside to find Josie and see if she'd be willing to open up and talk to me. I wasn't really sure what I wanted to talk about in particular, I doubt she'd want to chat about her treatment immediately, or, if what Shelly said was true, talk to me at all. As I walked on back behind the house where the orchard and barn were, it immediately struck me how goddamn humid it was out here...and it was only May. I feared what it'd be like once July and August came around, if I was already breaking out in a sweat now. 
	While walking along the dirty path to the barn, where Shelly said I could find Josie if she wasn't out hunting, I saw Esther tending to one of her trees in the orchard. She was floating along the branches as she picked what looked to be pears, putting them in a basket in one of hands. I waved at her and she gracefully landed on the grass, her ample bosom giving a definite jiggle as she landed I noted, and walked over to me.
	"Good afternoon Master Adrian, what might you be doing out here?" She asked in her sweet melodious tone. 
	"I was just getting a look at the rest of the estate, and was wanting to find Josie and talk to her." Esther gave a slight smirk and shook her head at that. "She's not much of a talker Master, I'd say she's more of a girl that likes to stick her to routine and nothing more..."
	"But, I believe I saw her enter the barn no too long ago, probably to milk the cows or get some eggs from the chickens." 
	"Thanks Esther. Also-uh, I told this to the ladies in the house so I figured I'd tell you two. If you'd like, you can sleep in one of the bedrooms upstairs, there's plenty of room and I might as well make use of them." Esther gave a warm smile and fluttered her eyes slightly after hearing my offer, but said "That's very kind of you, Master Adrian, but I've spent a long time working on my cabin out here, and I feel more at ease out in nature." Even when turning down my offer her voice was sweet like honey. 
	"Oh, uh that's no problem at all. That makes sense. Well, anyway, I think we're gonna do dinners in the dining hall every night so, don't work too hard! heh..." I give a force uncomfortable laugh and walk towards the barn, which was about fifty yards away from Esther's orchard. She waves with one of her top hands and flies back up to one of her trees to pick the fruit from it.
	While on my way to the barn I wondered about these urges I'd been feeling when it came to the girls and their...assets. It made me feel like I was some kind of deviant, having lewd thoughts regarding them. Not because they're repulsive, they all seem to be lovely women but, interspecies relations were frowned upon in both human and anthro societies. And relations with insects to most is seen as the same as bestiality, although the girls are far more intelligent than beasts...
It's....
It's not something gentlemen are supposed to do. Although life as a writer left me by myself most of the time during the day. The only times I would go out in public in Italy would be to go the grocer for food. My luck with women was equally as dismal as my social life. I had only known a woman's touch once, back in Venice, when a barmaid rabbit-girl took quite a liking to me after a night of heavy drinking. Drinking became a fairly common occurrence for me after my time in Custoza. And having my only sexual experience be with an anthro, left me guilt ridden, that I might never find a human woman to have a family with.  
	My thoughts came to a halt as I neared the white door of the red barn. Instantly I was filled with dread, because as pleasant as all the other residents of the estate had been, Josie was the only one to reject my kindness. And I wanted to know why that was. It also didn't help that she terrified me like none of the others had, with her sharp teeth-like feelers on her face, and constant scrutinizing look she gave me last night at the dinner table.
	I took a deep breath, and announced to Josie that I was coming in. As I did, the barn door groaned and creaked as I opened it, adding to the tenseness I was feeling. I got no response as I entered the barn, and thought she might not be in here, but found the wasp-lady squatted over a cow milking it.
	"What are you doing here." She said. Not really as a question more of a 'why are you disturbing me' kind of statement, in that same cold monotone voice.
	"O-oh I uhh...I was gonna ask if you wanted to sleep in one of the bedrooms upstairs because there's plenty of room up there and I asked the others earlier, and uh..."
	"I prefer to sleep here in the barn. Why did you really come in here to bother my work, Master?" She said, with an acidic emphasis on the word 'master'. I guess I'm not very good at hiding my motives. Maybe she could smell my fear, you always hear about wasps being able to do things like that.
	"I just wanted to let you know that I'm serious when I want the best all of you. I don't want to take advantage of you, I want you all to at least live decently...and not like slaves."
	"If you wanted what was best for us then you should have stayed in Italy." She stated while continuing to do her chores around the barn and not look at me.
	"If I stayed in Italy then this place would have been auctioned of to God know's who and who know's what they'd do to you all." I pleaded to try and make her understand where I was coming from, but her simple response cut me deep, and honestly made me wonder if I was only doing this for selfish reasons. 
	"What do I need to do to show you that I'm not going to be some slaver taking advantage of you?" 
	She turned her head and got up, and walked over to me, staring into my soul the entire time. I backed up slightly, and then she spoke.
	"Work like us. Staying inside writing all day might make YOU enough money, but it isn't going to sustain all of us." After saying her piece, she got back over to the cow and went back to milking, as if I had already left the barn.
	Before closing the barn and leaving Josie in peace, I turned and said one more thing-
	"Will you join us for dinner again?"
	
	
	"Fine."

Chapter VIII - Working Man

May 24th, 1858

	I chewed on what Josie had told me a few days ago. I wasn't sure what she had meant by just writing wouldn't be enough to provide for all of them, I had spent almost none of the small fortune I had incurred, and I thought it would be enough money for us until I had gotten the manuscript for my next book mailed to New York. But the more I thought of it, I wondered if she meant the type of work I did. As if she didn't really see what I did as actual work, and what everyone else did was. Either way, it did make me feel a bit insecure about my adequacy as a man if I couldn't do any of the heavy lifting around the house. 
	Since everyone in the house had their own job on the estate, I was filled with trepidation at trying to come up with what I could do. Then, yesterday, it came to me. It was so obvious! I lived on a tobacco plantation, why not grow tobacco? I personally had no use for it as I didn't care for the smell of smoke, but it was a very popular crop and would be a good way to supplement my income while I wrote. 
	It just so happened that while in the house's library, because of course, it's so big it has a library, I found a book on growing and planting tobacco. After reading up on the process of tobacco planting, I realized I would be a little bit late as it was May, as seedbeds needed to be cultivated and planted before being transferred to the fields around this time. But as luck would have it, the tobacco had already been prepared in the fields. 
	The next step was to make knee-high hills to soften the soil with rain. According to the book, this was the part of the work that was considered the most arduous, so it looked like I had my work cut out for me. After finishing breakfast, I put on some old clothes I wouldn't mind getting dirty, and headed out to one of the fields. Shelly fretted about how it would be unnecessary for me to work, but I told her it bothered me that I was pretty much watching all of them work while in the few days that I'd been here. All I had written a few correspondence letters to my publisher in New York, and that was it. 
	So, she reluctantly gave me the key to the shed where the tools I would need were kept and I began my work.
	Turns out making knee high hills all day is damn tiring work. The book said it would be impossible for one man to make more than five-hundred in one day, I was exhausted after only fifty. The process of fighting against the dirt where the tobacco seeds where, then making them tall enough, and spacing them out properly between each other frankly was some of the most tiring work I'd ever done, and it was only noon. I had completely forgone my shirt, and only had my dirty workpants and boots on as the sun beat down on me. Every hour or so, Shelly would check up on me from the porch to make sure I hadn't overexerted myself. She was even kind enough to bring me over lunch and some of Minnie's cold ice tea, which I appreciated very much and drank all of it in about ten seconds. 
	By early evening, I had only one-hundred and fifty hills made. I was totally exhausted. Sometime after, I took a short break which led to me taking a nap directly on the dirt. I didn't care because of how tired I was. I was awoken from my slumber to the heat of the sun still bearing down on me, and by a light kick on my shoulder.
	"You're going to turn as red as I am if you stay out here any longer, Master" The voice that I discerned was Josie said. As I got up, I noticed she was appraising my form similarly to how I had done to all of them, but I wasn't sure if she was thinking the same lewd thoughts I had been...
	"C'mon, we'll be late for dinner if we don't hurry up." She said as she started walking back towards the house. I threw my workshirt back on and followed her in stride. As we made our way back to the house, Shelly abruptly stopped me at the door.
	"Oooh no mister, I'm not letting you in the house covered in all that dirt!" I looked up at her in disbelief because of how much I was starving. But then I realized I was covered from head-to-toe in dirt. My hands, under my fingernails, all over my back, my hair, all of it was caked in filth.
	"W-where am I supposed to rinse off?" My question got a round of giggles from all the girls. 
	"Just jump in the pond Sweetheart, it'll clean ya off just fine~" Shelly said teasingly.
	The pond it was then. Graciously, Shelly handed me a towel, and I rounded the back of the house to the pond and hopped in. The coolness of the pond immediately put me at ease. After relaxing in the pond for several minutes, I got out to dry off when I realized I had no clean clothes to wear, as Shelly had taken my work clothes to be cleaned. I panicked, with only a towel to cover me. Thankfully, Shelly who was frequently becoming my savior, came out of the house with a folded pair of clothes.
	"Oh Shelly you're a life saver, I'd probably die from embarrassment having to walk through house with just a towel.
	"No problem Sweetheart~" She had a devious smile on her face, and held my clothes up to where I wasn't able to reach them with one hand, as I had the other around the towel to cover my dignity. But try as my might, my tarantula tormentor kept them just out of reach.
	"S-Shelly please! I need my clothes!" I pleaded while jumping to try and get them. All the while, the spider she-devil laughed hysterically at my plight. Eventually while trying to reach high enough to get them, I accidentally let go of my towel, and immediately pulled them down to cover my genitals. I was too beet-red with embarrassment to say anything to her as she kept snickering and giggling at me like a small child. 
	"Adrian! exposing yourself to one of your maids! What did I ever do to be stuck with such a naughty Master~" She said while faking a gasp and with feigned shock.
	I went behind the nearest tree to change while hearing her continue to snicker while she headed back to the house.  
	The dinner table had become much more lively than it was on the first night. The ladies exchanged stories about working with each other, how their days had gone, the usual commotion. What was out of the ordinary was Minnie and Shelly huddle close to each other speaking in hushed tones, occasionally glancing out me, then laughing like they just heard the funniest joke in the world. 
	I had to speak up. "Uhm is there something wrong me...?"
	While holding back laughter Minnie spoke up. "I didn't know humans could change color master." She said while both her and Shelly raucously laughed, causing all the other girls to laugh at my visage as well. As I touched my face, I could feel the heat from it radiate onto my fingertips, because of how burned my face was.
	"Don't think we're tryin' to give ya a hard time Sweetheart, we do appreciate what yer tryin' to do but...You do look like a lobste-HAHAHAHAHA!" Everyone else broke out into another round of laughter. I could even see Josie chuckling while she ate. Well, at least she was lightening up, even if it was at my expense.
	
	As tired as I was, later that night I sat on my balcony sipping a nightcap, watching the stars. It was so peaceful out here. The faint sound of crickets chirping was all I heard. I was surprised when I heard one of my balcony doors open, to be greeted by Shelly.
	"Hope ya don't mind me sneakin' in. I knocked to tell ya goodnight an' when you didn't open the door I let myself in and saw ya lookin' so peaceful out here I had to join you..."
	"Oh..no that's fine go right ahead." For a seven foot tall spider-woman,she must move pretty gracefully for me to not have heard her. As she sat next to me, I noticed her hair was down, and with her smile that I'd grown to love, she looked absolutely beautiful in the moonlight. With how her big brown hair swayed in the slight breeze, the comfortable look on her face, her full luscious lips curved up. Even her fuzzy feeler-things looked nice and soft.
	"See somethin' ya like Adrian~" She cooed softly at me.
	Shit I'd been caught staring too long at her. "U-uhm it's just that you look really nice with your uh..hair down with the moonlight shining."
	Hearing this caused her to turn her head slightly opposite of where I was looking up at her, while also moving her hand to hold mine. It felt...different. But in a pleasant way. The chitin wasn't too dissimilar to skin, almost like a hard rubber. And she had small hairs on them like on the rest of her fuzzy body that felt slightly ticklish, but nice. 
	"Look at you Master...makin' an old thing like me get all hot n' bothered~"
	"You certainly don't look your age, or at least, not to me." She giggled at my comment as we sit and gaze at the stars.
	We continue to sit basking in the moonlight, enjoying each other's company in silence. Every now and then she'd rub my palm with her thumb, and I'd squeeze down slightly. Her chitinous hand had more give to it than one would expect from what's part of an exoskeleton. It felt much like it would if you squeezed a human's hand.
	After letting out a long yawn, I told her it was time for me to turn in for the night, when suddenly she grabbed me as I got up and now I was at eye level with her, and pulled me in for a kiss. Much like the rest of this experience, it was different. Her lips were very smooth and soft, and her tongue felt very similar to what I would expect a tongue to feel like. What was different from what I was used to was her feelers on each side of her mouth, softly caressed my cheeks which felt a lot nicer than I would have thought they would feel.
	After what felt like an eternity, with time stopping while she held me like this, she slowly pulled away and brought me into a hug, nuzzling her head into the nape of my neck as she did. 
	"Good night...My handsome master Adrian...~"
	
Laying in bed, my mind was a whirlpool of emotions. Was what I did okay? I suppose she did initiate it, but was I leading her on in some way? Why did it feel like fireworks were going off in my mind and my heart while we held the kiss? This woman...this spider-anthro...beautiful amazing woman... I suppose this is what I secretly wanted, but I'd have to keep it to just this. Just a kiss. Or maybe more kisses in the future. Hugs were alright too. Because she was amazingly soft...well two specific parts of her body were amazingly soft. Minnie was soft as well...so was Alice...and Esther looked reeeally soft...I was slowly drifting off to sleep.
	And Josie was probably soft once I got to know her.......

	Just hugs....and occasionally a friendly kiss....that's all we'd do....


	
	That's all I'd do........................




Chapter IX - Learn To Fly

June 1st, 1848

	It'd been a week since I had started planting, and my efforts were having a definite change on my body. No longer was I a pale,  skinny-armed sad excuse for a man. My sunburns turned into a nice tan, giving my skin a nice olive oil complexion. My skinny and flabby body quickly turned to muscle, and Shelly was nice enough to give me a haircut and a shave. I looked like a new man, and got plenty of compliments from the girls for it. Even Josie was impressed by how well I had taken to the work of planting. There were several setbacks I ran into while working, weeds tended to grow, which would block or steal the nutrients the tobacco needed to grow and be strong and healthy, and therefore needed to be pulled. Along with a type of weevil that liked to eat the tobacco plant. But these were things that were manageable, and over the week I had successfully gotten five-hundred tobacco seeds planted.
	As I continued to work, I noticed a wagon pulling up along the road, wondering who it might be coming to visit. The wagon was more like a carriage, as it was made out of metal and had doors that swung open, revealing the person to be the portly bulldog who had convinced me to come here, Mr. John Tavern.
	"By God man! -huff- What the hell are you doing workin' the field Mr. Galliano!?" The bulldog-gentleman said as he waddled over to where me, already out of breath after moving fifteen feet. He probably barely recognized me without a shirt, and wearing a strawhat that Esther gave me, and with a much different physique.
	"Well, all the field working insects had apparently abandoned the place a month ago. And even though I had no use for a plantation, I decided I'd work it to supplement my income while I write."
	"Surely all the things didn't totally leave the place. I mean they're mindless creatures, if they don't got a leader they're aimless and without a purpose." The way he spoke about insect-anthros definitely irked me, because I knew they were just the same as me or him, even if they looked different. The five ladies I lived with were proof of that, and had changed my life for the better by knowing them.
	"Yeah...a few stayed, but they're all ladies and do housework, and it wouldn't feel right making them work the fields." That answer seemed to satisfy him.
	"So what brings you here, Mr. Tavern?"
	"Oh I simply wanted to check up on you, see how things were going. It's a shame you don't got any males to work the fields, when your uncle had this place at its height, he'd have a thousand of them drones workin' these fields, planting tobacco like a well-oiled machine. 
	"Ten years ago, Folsom was the largest producer in the whole state of Virginia. Then after your aunt died, it seemed to take the life out of him...My guess is he died from a broken heart, just couldn't see a reason for living without her."
	"Now, if you'd be interested...we're havin' a slave auction here in a few weeks. Dollar a head. You could probably get this place up to how your uncle used to have it if you're interested."
	The idea of forcing more people into bondage made me wretch, I didn't want to be anymore a part of it than I already was. As much as I wanted to tell the fat-fuck to get off my property because of how much his presence was testing my patience, I politely replied saying "I think I'll have to turn that down, this is more of something for me to do topass the time, then as my main job, but thanks for the offer."
After chit-chatting a while longer, he gives me a card with his mailing address on it, and finally leaves me in peace.
	But my exchange with the fat bulldog did leave me wondering something. I had no means of transportation into town, as it was fifteen miles from the front gate. Speaking of which, I'd need to ask Shelly about a lock so I don't get more intruders coming in. I did however want to go to town to buy a few things, namely, some nicer clothes for the ladies. But walking fifteen miles to town and back would be an all day venture, and if I needed to go there regularly, transportation would be a necessity.
	I brought this up at the dinner table that night, Minnie suggested that I could pay for a horse-anthro like the stallion that had carried me here the day I moved in. But that didn't seem entirely practical, especially if I wasn't going to need to go into town everyday which I suspected I wouldn't be doing. It wasn't until Esther spoke up that I had any clue of what to do.
	"I would be willing to fly you into town Master, if you don't mind." She said with a smile.
That would honestly be perfect, I thought. I wouldn't need to find someone else's services, and seeing how quickly Esther got around with her wings, it would probably be faster than going down the road to town in a horse-drawn carriage. The only question I had was if I'd be too heavy for her to carry into town.
	"I'm stronger than I look Master, It'd be no problem for me to carry you. I had to carry a lot of heavy things when I was building my cabin." 
That did make sense. I doubt she got got much help from anyone else building it, so she must be pretty strong. 
"If it's not too much of a hassle, would you be willing to leave in the morning?" 
"That sounds perfect, Master" Esther said with a small smile.

June 2nd, 1848

	I met Esther by her cabin in the orchard early in the morning. She greeted me wearing her usual outfit of overalls and an undershirt, looking as gorgeous as she always did. 
	"Are you ready to head to town, Master?"
	"Ready when you are, and again, thank you for being so willing to do this for me Esther."
	"Mmhmm, It's no problem at all Master, it's nice to be able to spread my wings and take to the skies every now and again."
	We then got situated assuming are positions to take flight. I was incredibly nervous as I'd rarely ever left the ground in my life. I didn't even like going aboard ships, let alone flying.
	Ester got up behind me and grabbed me by the chest with her top set of arms, and by the midsection with her bottom set. I could also feel her chest pushing against my back softly, which put me at ease a little bit before we took off.
	"Are you ready, Master?"
	"As ready as I'll ever be."
	Esther then slowly flapped her wings, and after a few seconds I could feel the wind push against us, and the next thing I knew, we were off the ground. I caught my breath as we lifted upwards, my heart racing even though we were only maybe five feet off the ground. As we went higher my heart raced faster, in both excitement and terror. After a minute, we began moving forward as Esther found a steady pace while flying. I was amazed at how stable and easy it felt. I also wondered how many human men are out there in the world that are able to see that they've flown like a bird? Of course I wasn't alone, but the experience was exhilarating nonetheless.
	"Are you comfortable, Master?"
	"Y-yeah, this is amazing Esther! are you sure you're not having any trouble with my extra weight?"
	"Nope." She beamed "Now that we've caught the breeze, I can barely tell that I'm carrying you." I did feel the wind under us, it was slightly cool, even though by now it'd normally be fairly humid in the day. Being in flight also gave me a new perspective on how to see things, literally. Something as simple as seeing the tops of trees was incredible to me, and to Esther, it must be mundane. 
	While I continued to marvel at what was happening, we soon made are way close to the town, and landed back onto the ground, as we both agreed that we would walk the last mile in as to not gather any unwanted attention. My feet were unsteady the first few steps I took, as they had been used to floating in the air for the past half an hour. But I found my footing as we made our way into town.
	Making our way to the town's business district, I could see people, both anthro and human, staring at me and Esther. Judging by the looks on their faces, it was like I was parading around a feral beast with me. Although when I nervously looked over at Esther, she only stared ahead, as if we were the only two people in town. 
	Aside from the gawking, I was able to complete all my errands I needed to in town, such as mailing several letters. Esther helped me pick out some dresses and other clothes for the ladies to wear, and helped me with their sizes. We were even able to find one for Shelly, as the town had a larger anthros as residents, and thus the dressmaker also sold larger dresses. 
	After leaving downtown, Esther picked me up once again and we flew back home, with me holding the dresses. It was just as exciting and scary as it had been the first time, although I got used to being off the ground quicker. When we landed back on the estate property, we handed out all the dresses to the other ladies, even giving one to Josie, though I doubt she'd wear it.
	Overall, the ladies seemed to be excited about having new clothes. Along with dresses I also picked up some clothes they could work in, which they greatly appreciated, especially Alice as her blouse looked more like a smattering of rags than clothes. I received many hugs and 'thank yous' from them, making me feel like my efforts to give these women a decent life in spite of their predicament, weren't in vein. Secretly, I was also excited that they seemed to be warming up to me more. I was beginning to love their touches, how their chitinous hands felt. The softness from Shelly and Esther's hugs also excited me greatly, and always left me blushing.
	I'd lived here for only a few weeks, but I've grown incredibly fond of all the ladies here. Even the work, as tiring as it is, I've started to enjoy for what it's been doing to my physique. Dare I say I'd even been falling in love with all of them... They were all so different and unique, and had something I loved about each of them.
Esther's laid back, cheerful personality always brightened my day along with her.. assets.
Alice's quiet demeanor, and her piano playing was always a highlight of my day.
Minnie, with how she cooked was a blessing, and her chipper personality made her great to talk to.
Josie, even with her being obstinate to me in the beginning, had slowly been thawing and was the hardest worker of all of them, and never asked for anything in return.
And Shelly...the house would be a total mess without her, and I'd be even more over my head about this whole thing than I am with her. Her visits to the balcony had become a nightly occurrence, and even though they hadn't been as...touching as they had been the first time, she had other ways of making me hot under the collar. Such as letting the top of her blouse sag lower giving me a view of her very impressive bust, or how she would rub my thighs, inching ever so closely to my crotch.
	I suppose on top of making me a deviant for lusting after the insect-women that inhabited the house with me, I was also a polygamist for having feelings for all of them. But I was becoming more comfortable with that, because I loved being around them, and I loved my new family that I had become a part of, and no one was going to tell me otherwise.

It was then that my inner-monologue was interrupted by the door to my balcony opening....



Chapter X - Nights In White Satin

	What greeted me was Shelly. But this was a different Shelly, wearing the fancy green dress I had bought her earlier, along with what appeared to be makeup along her eight eyes, and red lipstick, accentuating her full lips. It was quite the sight, the dress hugged her figure in all the right places; making her hips look fuller and the neck of it being low enough to make her large brown bust look even more alluring. Her dark hazel hair was let down, and was slightly curly. She also smelled like she was wearing a flowery perfume of some kind.
	All in all, she looked absolutely stunning. Simply gazing at her I noticed there was a growing tightness in my pants that wasn't there before, along with my face turning red.
"Hey Sweetheart, hope ya don't mind if I join ya."
	Shelly sat beside me and immediately goes for my hand. We sit together basking in the moonlight for a moment When I decide to break the silence.
"What's the occasion?" I ask, while pointing to her dress.
"Well I figured since you were nice enough to pick these out for all of that you'd wanna see what one looks like~"
But after saying this, she frowns slightly while looking at the ground, then, she pulls me close to her and looks at me in the eyes.
	"Adrian. I need to know something. I need to know how ya feel about us...about me. 'Cuz when you're around me...I can smell your arousal. Heck, all of us can. And when a bug likes someone, they release pheromones, and when these two happen together it just makes us go all stir-crazy."
Dammit. If it wasn't my gawking at their breasts, they can also smell when I'm horny as well...Guess I've been fighting a losing battle when it comes to keeping a professional relationship...
	"So I need to know if you...if you like us-me that way. Because when I smell ya and see the way ya look at me...it's hard to keep myself from doin' something I might regret later."
"So Master...A-Adrian. Do you want me?"
	While Shelly is saying all of this, her eight eyes are staring directly into my two. I'd be lying if I said this wasn't an intimidating situation to be in. Not because I was scared of Shelly, but because I was scared to make the jump. For our relationship to become sexual. But as I thought about it, why should I care? why should I be scared? Plus if them smelling my arousal sent them into a state of heat, how fair would it be to just lead them on and not reciprocate?
	As I looked into her pleading eyes, I answered her question by leaning in with a kiss. I could feel Shelly gasp slightly in my mouth, but soon she leaned in as well and kiss me in kind. As our tongues danced against each other, I felt that familiar caress of her feelers, along with her arms bringing me in for a deep hug. Her front two legs also pulled me towards her as I felt her slowly grind up against my pelvis. On a snap decision, I reached up with one hand to touch her large breasts as my arousal grew and warmth engulfed my whole body. My ministrations with her tits elicited soft moans from Shelly, prompting me to tease her nipples, which caused her to moan even more into my mouth. 
I was out of breath when Shelly pulled away from our intimate kiss. She must have been as well, as she was panting for air.
	"Adrian...I've been wantin' to do this since the first night we kissed. Please...please love me~"
She then went for another kiss, although this time I felt a chitinous hand snake down into my pants and latch onto my inflamed cock. The unexpected gesture caused me to yelp slightly as she massaged it with her hand. Shelly giggled while continuing to kiss me. Her fingers felt incredible on me; the small hairs that covered her body tickled and felt amazing as her hand moved up and down against my shaft.
	Her other hand descended to my pants as well, undoing my zipper and bringing my pants down to my ankles. With my cock free from it's imprisoning trousers, I noticed Shelly staring at it standing on its own. I then looked back up to my beautiful Shelly, who gave a small smile and grabbed back onto my now fully erect member.
"Lemme take care of that Sweetheart...~" She said with a sultry look in her eyes.
Her whole body then went downward, and because of how large she is in contrast to me, leaned in as she knelt down to be eye-level with my cock. Shelly stared hungrily at it for a moment, then brought her mouth to my dick. She started out by kissing the head of it delicately, causing my breathing to become shallow as I'd never felt a woman do this to me before. She then took my cock into her mouth at an agonizingly slow pace, her tongue and lips wrapping around the head. The pleasure felt like electricity going through my body, every lick, suck, and kiss intentional as she continued her fellating.
	After a minute of playing with the head of my penis, she swallowed more of my shaft, to the point where my cock had completely disappeared in Shelly's mouth. After keeping my whole dick in her mouth for what felt like a millennia, she began to bob her head up and down. Slowly at first, then picking up speed. Every time she came back down, her feelers would caress my scrotum, making me moan loudly at the sensation. My hips began to buck into her face as I felt my climax coming close. Shelly must have felt I was close as well, as she stifled her pace, and then took my cock out of her mouth. I was leaking precum as I looked down in fright that she wasn't going to let me finish. As I looked to Shelly, she had a devious smile on her face and began to pull her dress down, revealing her magnificent tits.
	Seeing them undressed, I noticed her nipples were a lighter brown than the rest of her breasts, and her tits were also covered in small hairs. But I wasn't sure why she had pulled them out until she got up slightly, and brought her chest to my pelvis. By the time I had put together in my head what she had planned for me, it was too late. My cock was enveloped between her pillowy mounds. While grabbing to press them together with her arms, she moved her bust up and down in the same motion she did with her mouth. As she did this, my penis disappeared between her tits every time she went up, and as she went down, Shelly licked the head of my cock, sending a sharp signal of pleasure all throughout my body. Her ministrations with her massive breasts had become too much for me, and my hips started to spasm and jerk as I cried out to her, and fiercely fired my hot white load all over her tits and face.
	As I came down from the euphoric high of cumming, I see Shelly has lapped up most my jism from her body, causing my dick to twitch at seeing her do so even just after ejaculating.
"S-sorry for making a mess Shelly..." I said, self conscious about my display.
"No problem at all Sweetheart. 'Specially when you taste delicious..~" She then got up and gave me a quick peck on the lips.
"But I sure hope that's not all ya got 'cuz I'm not done with ya just yet..." She says in a low sultry whisper, causing my cheeks to turn red once more, and my cock to spring back to life.
	Shelly then picked me up in both arms, holding me like a mother would a child, as she led us to my bed. It felt a little bit emasculating being carried by her, but I also enjoyed it, so I decided not to say anything to not kill the moment. As she laid me on top of the bed, she then crawled up as well, and hovered over me. She stripped her dress off tantalizingly, while grinding against me with her lower-half. I felt a definite wetness against my member as she did this, the combined moisture and heat causing me to go fully erect once more. Casting her dress aside, she then slowly removed her panties from her more human-like front pair of legs, sliding them down her full thighs and past her spider-feet onto the floor.
	I got to see Shelly's beautiful frame in its full glory without any clothes to hinder my view. Her mountainous breasts that I'd come accustom to knowing were still as arousing as ever, but as my eyes made their way down the rest of her figure, I noted her midriff was slightly pudgy, but only added to her curvy figure. Her vagina looked similar enough to what I would expect, and felt incredibly hot against my cock, aching with need.
	We then positioned each other where I could penetrate her, and she leaned down closer to me, her hair falling into my face as she began to speak.
	"A-Adrian, you're gonna be the first to mate with me, an'... even though we ain't the same I wouldn't have it any other way." 
She brushed her hair away and kiss me as I felt her large back frame land on me. As her pussy enveloped tightly around my cock, my head went completely blank,it was so tight, I'd never felt anything like it in my life. What brought me back to reality was the feeling of Shelly's lips quivering and vibrating against mine as she moaned loudly into my mouth as we kissed. 
	After making our way through the initial quake of pleasure, Shelly slowly began to lift her lower-half off of me, and back down onto me. We held each other's hands while doing so, and I began rubbing my thumbs against her hands to comfort her as she continued lifting up and down unto me, I could tell she was struggling through it, as she was a virgin mere moments ago. I then decided to help her out and not make her do all the work, bucking my hips against hers, thrusting my cock as deep as it could go into her vise-like pussy. This caused her body to tremble, and moan louder, eventually breaking our kiss. I began to as well, each of us moaning out each other's names. The combined weight of our bodies as we made love caused the bed to creak and groan underneath, but neither of us cared as we were both in ecstasy.
	As I began to feel pressure buildup in my cock, I grabbed onto Shelly's shoulders, bringing her as tightly as I could next to me as I thrust into her like my life depended on it. Shelly screamed "Iloveyous" into my shoulder, as we came at the same time, Shelly slammed down, while I thrust up into her. After reaching our climax, Shelly collapsed her body on top of mine, both of our breathing shallow from the pleasurable ordeal, and I felt our mixture of fluids trickle down from her pussy onto the satin white sheets.
	As I loosened my embrace, I felt Shelly kiss and suckle on my neck. The moment was absolutely perfect, and if I died while Shelly and I held onto each other, I would have died a happy man. But, the moment did end, and Shelly helped me get under the sheets of the bed, and she got back on top of me it was an awkward position to be in, but wasn't uncomfortable as I relaxed. Sleep began to call to me, and I gave Shelly one final kiss goodnight. 
But before drifting off into sleep I had one final thing to say.

"Shelly?"

"Mmhmm...?" 

"I love you too."



Chapter XI - You're Not The Only One I Know
 
June 3rd, 1858
 
    I was awoken by a stirring of movement on top of me. Shelly had gotten out of bed, and smiled when she saw me moving around.
"Sleep well?"
"Better than I have in a long time." I remarked while getting out of bed to stretch.
"Hey, just so ya know, all the girls are gonna smell me on you and vice-versa. And I know they feel the same way I do about ya, even though some of them are too nice to say anythin' about it like Minnie and Alice." Shelly then went over to hug me.
"I don't mind sharin', but don't forget about this old and lonely spider." She said while bringing me closer to her for a light peck on the cheek.
"How could I ever forget about you?" I asked while looking at Shelly. "The house would be a total wreck without you Shelly. I need you." I said, smiling warmly at her.
"Thanks Sweetheart. I needed to hear that." After a few moments, she broke our hug and carried her dress back to her room.
    All alone, I decided that what I needed was a nice long bath to start the morning. Even if there was nothing I could do to stop smelling like sex, it wouldn't hurt to mitigate it and not reek of it all day long. But I did wonder if I'd be able to handle being with all five ladies. I was only one man after all, and I'd known men who had trouble being with one woman, let alone trying to stay faithful to five.
    While ruminating, I went back out to the field to continue planting. My goal was to get at least 1,500 seeds planted, as I figured that would bring in enough money for the rest of the year and start of next year along with what I brought over. It's not like it would be that big of an issue, as we were already fairly self sufficient with plenty of food from Esther's orchard, and Josie's farming and hunting. But I feared my problems would be more interpersonal than financial...
 
June 5th, 1858
 
    After dinner, I went up to my study to start writing. I had a few ideas for short stories, but over the past few weeks I'd been too tired to put pen to paper. My life had been so chaotic, I'd barely been able to do the one thing that had always been my outlet; writing. Ever since I was a little boy, I enjoyed writing stories of all kinds as an escape from my predicament of being stuck with my tormenting father. Even if it was for just a little while.
    As much as I had grown fond of my new life here with the five lovely ladies, writing by myself in peace and quiet was where I felt most at home. But one thing did disturb my peace and that was my own thoughts. I had noticed that the girls seemed to be a bit more on edge, and I still wasn't great at reading their body language. But if what Shelly said was true, they would be in a state similar to anthros going into heat. Which both excited me and made me feel guilty for putting them in that kind of situation.
    The room I'd picked to write in was on the second floor, adjacent to the piano room. Although I generally preferred absolute silence when writing, Alice's playing was calming, and made for nice background noise. After about an hour of writing, I decided to call it a night, as I wasn't in that great of a rush to get anything sent out. I went over to the piano room to maybe finally get some lessons from Alice.
    Over the past few weeks, Alice had warmed up to me, going from being a shy moth-girl who wouldn't look me in the eyes, to an enthusiastic young woman who constantly asked questions about my life in Europe, and had developed a habit of clinging on to my arms with one of her pairs of grey fuzzy arms when she sat next to me.
    Alice showed me a few scales I wasn't aware of, and demonstrated a simple melody that was easy enough for me to follow. It amazed me that most of what she knew was self-taught; she really was quite talented. After about an hour or so of playing, the candles had shrunk in size and dimmed into the night. I reckoned it had be to about eleven o'clock. Alice stifled a yawn as well, and I helped her gather up all her books and sheets of music to be put back in storage. I bent over to kiss her on the forehead and bid her a good night, but as I made my way toward the door, I felt a light tug on my shirt, preventing my escape.
    "Umm...Adrian...Could you...uhh..." Clearly Alice had something on her mind that she wanted to get off her chest. but either couldn't find the words, or was too flustered to get out what she was going to say.
    "What's the matter Alice?, you can tell me anything, you know that."
    She then got very close to me, and wrapped her four arms around my waist, and buried her head into my sternum, mumbling something I could barely make out.
    "CouldyoupleasesleepinmybedlikeyouletShellysleepwithyou"
    "I'm sorry...what?"
    Alice looked back up at me, I moved her long hair out of her eyes to get a better look at her.
    "You let Miss Shelly sleep in your bed because she couldn't sleep, right? Well, I've been having trouble since then too, I've been feeling really hot and sweaty. and-and my belly tingles..."
    God bless her poor soul. Although Alice was twenty-one years old, she must have never gotten "The Talk" when it comes to reproduction. Perhaps my aunt or Shelly or whoever didn't think it'd be necessary for her. I felt bad for her that her pheromones were going out of whack all because of me, but maybe just by being close it'd put her mind at ease. Though I knew this was probably wishful thinking.
    "So do you think if I slept in your bed tonight, you'd sleep easier?"
    "Yeah..." She said, rubbing her head against me while speaking.
    "Well alright then, but only for tonight, you're not a little girl anymore, are you?" I said, smiling and patting her on the head.
    "No..." Alice said in return, smiling back up at me, with a bit of excitement in her large, dark grey eyes.
 
 
    Alice's room was small, but comfy, and definitely felt like something that was 'hers'. There were sheets of music strewn about on the nightstand by her bed, and her clothes were in a pile on the floor. I thought about saying something about it to her, but figured if this is how she liked her bedroom, then it's not my place to critique.
    I took off my shirt to get more comfortable, and Alice finished changing into her nightgown. She looked off to the side, blushing slightly. I suppose it was a little odd to see me shirtless, and I was in much better shape physically than when I first got here.           
Alice seemed to be waiting for me to climb in first, so I obliged her. I pulled the sheets back and laid on my side facing her.             She awkwardly made her way into the bed, the mattress sinking more slightly with our combined weight. She wasn't particularly graceful, falling into the bed near me and clutching onto my chest when she settled in. It was terribly cute.
    "Is this better?"
    "Mmhmm..." She said, nodding her head into my chest. I could feel her take big, deep breathes, as if she was trying to inhale my scent, but I didn't think much of it.
    Contrary to what I initially thought, the stirring only got worse, with Alice's breathing becoming shallow, along with her grinding her crotch into mine, causing me to have to shift with my loins coming to life at the sudden stimulation.
    "Hey, Alice...are you alright?"
    "H-hot..."
    Alice was panting at this point, so I removed the sheets from her, but she still stayed glued to me.
    "I-I need..."
    She was mumbling even more than she usually did, and I noticed a definite wet spot on my pants. It seemed me being here had only made things worse, sending her into heat, and because she didn't know what that was, Alice didn't know how to deal with it. This put me in quite the precarious situation. If I helped her in the way that I know would calm her down, would I be taking advantage of her? Obviously the major downside of her getting pregnant wasn't biologically possible, but...it just didn't sit right with me, and it's not like I could give an in-depth lecture on sex and reproduction, especially with the state she was in. But, if I was the one responsible for putting her in this kind of a fit, then I should take care of it.
    "Hey Alice, look at me."
    She stopped her stirring momentarily as I got up from the bed and positioned myself where I was above her. She looked up at me intently, still panting slightly, and opened her legs to get closer to me.
    "I know a way to make you not feel so burnt up, but I can't really explain it right now...Do you trust me?"
    She responded by giving me an uncomfortable smile, but composed herself enough to speak.
     "Yes. I trust you because I know you love me..."
    That caught me off guard. While it was true, I guess I had grown fond of all the ladies to say I 'loved' them. But did I love them romantically? Or was it just bestial lust? I shook my head internally. No, I DID love them. And I was going to show Alice how much she meant to me.
    "That's right. I do love you." I said smiling, getting a little misty eyed as I said it.
    I leaned my face closer to hers, as she caught me off guard once more by bringing her lips to mine. Her inexperience showed, as she mashed her face against mine, and didn't know what else to do. I helped her out by moving my tongue slowly into her mouth, dancing it against hers. Her tongue was much thinner than mine, and as I spurred her on, I noticed it was much longer as well. It felt different than Shelly's, but in a pleasant way.
     I then moved my hands downward to explore her body, planting my left hand on one of her perky breasts, rubbing my thumb against the hardening nipple, and slowly snaked my right hand down to her nethers. I brushed her nightgown away so it wouldn't obstruct her panties, and gave me ease of access. I started out by making a circular motion with my index and middle fingers along the outside of her covered vagina. Eliciting soft moans from Alice. She began to grind her hips into mine, nudging me further. I slipped my hand into her panties, and began rubbing her pussy more intimately. Alice's breathing became much more erratic now, and moaned louder, but still in her usual soft tone. I slipped my  middle finger into her folds, Alice responded by bucking into my hand, and I began stimulating her clit with my thumb.
    She let out a quiet shriek as she came, probably her first orgasm. As she came down from the high of my hand, her breathing settled a bit more.
    I removed my hand from her breast, and began pulling her panties from her legs. Alice also removed her nightgown, and threw it onto the pile of clothes in the middle of her bedroom floor.
    I drank in Alice's figure before me. Her body was entirely light grey, much fuzzier than Shelly, almost like she had a coat of fur like some mammal-anthros would. Her breasts were tiny in comparison to the spiders', but were perky looked just as cute as the rest of Alice.
     She looked up at me expectantly, her antennae darting around chaotically. I myself was looking for relief, as I was fully erect bulging tightly in my pants.
    Removing them hastily, I got into a position where I was comfortably above Alice, and hooked my arms under her lower pair of arms to keep her stable. My cock was right at the entrance her pussy, and brushed against her labia, making Alice moan as she looked at my lower body.
    "I'm gonna take it slow, let me know if it hurts at all, alright?"
    She nodded her head, biting her lower lip in anticipation of what was going to happen.
    Slowly, I aimed the tip of my cock into her, being as delicate as I could.  It took a minute, but after getting the head in, I looked back up at Alice to see how she was holding up. Her breath seemed stable, and she didn't look like she was in any pain. I gave her a quick peck on the lips to reassure her, and pressed on.
    I moved my hips slightly, letting more of my length enter her glistening warm folds. It was a struggle for me to try and not cum after putting it in her, as she was easily twice as tight as Shelly was. Her pussy had a vise-like grip on me, but I soldiered forward, doing my best to satisfy Alice.
    I kept at my glacial pace, and finally, my hips were connected to hers. Alice continued to moan softly, and even locked her legs behind my back, signalling that she wasn't going to let me go. The fuzzy sensation on my back was definitely pleasant, and she continued to surprise me.
    Once more, I brought my face to hers and kissed her, wrapping my tongue around hers. I held onto her tighter, and began moving my hips out. It was a little harder than I expected, my thrusts were short and slow, with Alice's legs wrapped around me. But it heightened my own incoming orgasm, each little thrust building up to my climax.
    Alice loosened the grip of her legs as I began to feel her lose control. Instead of kissing me back, she moaned into my mouth, lost in ecstasy.
    I increased the tempo of my thrusts, pumping faster, but with the same short motions.
    I couldn't take it anymore, the tightness, the way she forced me to keep my thrusts short, it was too much. I embraced Alice as tightly as I could without hurting her, grunting as cum flooded into her pussy.
    Alice continued grinding into me, as if she was trying to milk every drop she could out of my cock.
    After taking a moment to calm down, we laid there, embracing each other. Occasionally stealing a kiss from one another. Alice looked totally spent, her hair was a mess and partially concealed her face. I moved away from her slightly to lay on my side once more. I thought about saying something to her, but I could hear she was fast asleep by her breathing, and her eyes closed. Removing my penis from her, I hugged her tightly, putting my arms over her breasts as her tight butt made it's way over my midsection.
    Sleep also beckoned me, but I couldn't help but feel a pang of guilt at what I'd done. Alice didn't seem like she was mad in pain, or distraught, quite the opposite actually. But I still worried...
 
No matter, it could all wait for tomorrow...



Chapter XII - Two Beads At The End
 
June 6th, 1858
 
    "Aaaalice! Get your lazy butt outta bed! I need you to help me wash the bed sheets!"
    The sound of Shelly's booming voice startles me back to the waking world, as my vision clears, sunshine beams through the window and onto the large spider, dressed in her usual maid outfit.
    "A-Adrian?"
    I'm still groggy and ill-humored after just waking, but nudge Alice to get up. She protests by stirring under the sheets but her head pops out next to mine.
    Shelly gives me the "I know what you two kids have been up to" look as she smugly smiles at me, putting her hands on her wide hips.
    "Sorry Master, I'm not interrupting anything am I~?"
    "N-no, I'll let you and Alice get started with the day, sorry about being in the way." I said, blushing, my face beet red. As I made my way out of Alice bedroom, Shelly firmly grabbed onto my arm, shocking me into place.
    "I know she won't say it, so I will. Thank you." Shelly whispered into my ear.
    "F-for what?"
    "For loving her, Sweetheart. I know deep down, all the other girls care about Alice, but some aren't that great at showin' it. It means a lot to her, to be loved."
    "I-I'm just trying to do my best..." I say, still embarrassed by Shelly catching me in Alice's bed.
    "And that's why *I*, love you." Shelly said, giving me a light peck on the lips.
    Shelly let me go and I headed back to my room to get ready for the day.
 
 
    Work in the field went without a hitch, but by noon, I noticed clouds coming over and blocking out the sun. Soon after, the sound of thunder boomed, and rain poured down. With a sigh, I gathered all my things to take back to the shed, and headed back for the house.
    The rain turned into a downpour, and any hope of making progress on the fields today would have to be scrapped. Esther opted to work in her cabin, and Josie wasn't in the barn, probably out hunting.
    I went up to my study, but couldn't get anything to come to me as I stared blankly at the neat, unmarked paper in front of me. As I looked out at the overcast sky, rain hit the window. It's just going to be one of those days, where nothing happened, I thought. But that sort of thing bothered me, because it meant that I was left to my own thoughts.
    If I kept myself busy, I could prevent my mind from wandering, and thinking about things I'd rather not dwell on. But as I stared out the window, I thought about many grim things. If what I was doing was okay, if this was just a giant farce to make me feel better. "Oh here comes the big strong human savior! Here to recuse these poor, poor anthro girls from bondage! But only because he wants to *fuck* them. Because he's actually a coward, a degenerate. Dooming his family's bloodline to end with him because he's a selfish bastard that can only think about his most base desires."
    "Just like back in Venice, selling out the lives of your brothers for profit, to write a book about it. You're no writer, you're a charlatan." The voice taunting me in my mind now sounding more like my father; after coming home in the middle of the night from the pub. I could see him standing in front of me at my desk, he was tall, he smelled like cheap booze and oil from the factory. I felt him look down at me and sneer as he continued to chide, pointing a calloused, dirty finger at me.
    "You did all of this just to get out of actually having to lift a finger. You've never done a hard day's work in your pathetic, miserable life. Too scared to find a nice human girl to marry, instead becoming some kind of bug-loving polygamist with his own harem, like some kind of morally bankrupt sandnigger prince in Arabia. They don't even like you, they can't think, they're just beasts, they're chattel!"
    I threw my glass of whiskey I'd been sipping on at where my father had been standing, with all my might, and as hard as I could.
   
    "SHUT THE FUCK UP!!!"
 
    I realized I was now standing up, my breathing had become fast and erratic, and sweat dripped down my brow. My eyes were wide, I was on edge, but nothing was in front me except a now broken glass, and some whiskey on the wood floor of my study. I collapsed back into my chair, and let out a long drawn out sigh. This is why I hated not having anything to focus on. It always brought me back to my father.
    The door swung open as Shelly entered, I could see Alice behind her. They both had incredibly worried expressions in their eyes.
    "Dear Lord, Adrian! I thought someone had broken in somehow and attacked you! I heard ya yell and some glass break when we were on the top floor, and it scared me half to death! What's the matter, Sweetheart?"
    I rubbed my eyes and ran a hand through my hair.
    "It's nothing. I, I just get grim thoughts when I don't have anything to do...Uh, especially when it's raining." That was only partially true, but I didn't want to burden either of them with recounting my childhood, especially my father. My problems were my own, and I didn't need to have them fretting about me.
    "Well, I'll go get a rag and the dustpan an-"
    "No, please Shelly, let me get it. I made the mess, I should clean it."
    "Fair enough, and if you're looking for somethin' to do, Minnie could probably use some help cleaning up in the kitchen."
    As I got up to go fetch the dustpan, Shelly once again stopped me dead in my tracks, and grabbed a hold of me. I hope she didn't plan on making this a regular occurrence, she had a frighteningly strong grip. But her eyes were pleading, and filled with concern, almost like she was on the verge of tears in all eight of her eyes.
    "Adrian. Please, if there's anything you need to talk about, PLEASE please tell me. If you're not ready, that's fine. But I don't wanna see you in rough shape. You're part of our family too." She said while lifting me off my feet and entrapping me in a bear hug.
    "Thanks Shelly...I-I will. Promise"
    "Thankya Sweetheart." She said, kissing me on the cheek before letting me down.
 
   
    After finishing up cleaning the floor, I took Shelly's advice and headed down to assist Minnie if she needed me. Even if she didn't, I always enjoyed Minnie's company and chipper personality.
    Heading towards the kitchen, there she was. Cleaning out some pots by the look of it, and bending down to get something from one of the cabinets on the floor. As she did, her blouse lifted up just enough for me to get a glance at her panties, allowing me to see her firm yellow rump. Goddamn, she had a nice ass. I beat myself mentally for my comment to myself. This was Minnie you oaf, not some street whore.
    Ignoring my internal dialogue, I tried to put on my best happy face as I approached the kitchen.
    "Oh! Hey Master! Do you need something?" The honeybee-girl said with a bright smile, instantly causing my worries in my head to go away. I was able to return her kindness with a genuine smile as I approached the counter-top.
    "Well, since working the fields would be a lost cause with it being a downpour, and now I'm unfortunately in the middle of writer's block, I figured I'd help out with cleaning the kitchen, if that's alright with you?"
    Minnie's black eyes went wide, and she began to play with her hair nervously and look off at the pots full of water. Dammit, I hope she didn't get affected by the 'heat' like Alice had...
    Maybe I was overreacting, helping her clean wasn't something I did often, as I was typically busy in the fields, and it could have been genuine shock. *The girls lives don't entirely revolve around your cock, you pervert.* The darker part of my mind chided to me.
    "Umm, no, thank you! That'd be great!" Minnie handed me a mop, and resumed cleaning the pots she had on the stove. Getting a match, and lighting the stove for the water to boil to get all the grease out of them. We made small-talk as we worked, but Minnie seemed unnaturally cagey around me. Again like Alice, it was as if she wanted to say something but didn't know how. My first thought of course was that her pheromones had become unbalanced like Alice and she was in a heat-state, but I'd rather not jump to conclusions.
    "Hey Minnie, can I talk to you about something?" I said, looking over to her as she worked.
    "What's on your mind, Master?" She said turning to me. Did her blouse always show that much cleavage? I could see underneath her apron that her blouse looked like it was cut lower than normal, but perhaps I didn't notice. Her tits were just as fine as her rump though, same color of yellow that made her look more...exotic?
    I cleared my head of lewd thoughts as I spoke up.
    "Well, I don't really feel like I get the chance to talk with your one-on-one, because I'm always busy either out in the fields or writing, and you're in here, and I feel we only talk at the dinner table...I just wanted to say I appreciate all you do when it comes to cooking, you're easily the best chef I've ever had." I said with a warm smile.
    I could see her do what I'd discovered was the insect-anthro equivalent of blushing, by seeing antennae lower, and her give a sheepish smile as she turned her head to look away from me.
    "Thanks Master Adrian...I'd love it if you'd want to uh...talk more..."
    "No problem. If I don't get caught up in all the comings and goings of being here I'll make more time for you."
    I let my comment hang in the air and went back to mopping the floor. Out of the corner of my eye, I could see Minnie was staring at me, and almost looked like she was biting her lower lip, but I wasn't entirely sure. I stopped mopping to see if she needed something, but once she saw she'd been caught gawking, I could see her panic slightly by her eyes going wide.
    U-uh...I need...yo-TO get some things from the pantry. I'll be right back!"
    Minnie instead of running, actually flew over to the door that led from the kitchen to the pantry.
    Strange, I'd never seen her fly before. In fact I assumed her wings were vestigial, considering they were smaller than Esther, Josie, and even Alice's pairs of wings. Especially since Minnie was on the thicker side when it came to the ladies here, not that I minded at all. She looked amazing, and was stacked when it came to assets, even giving Shelly a run for her money proportionally.
    After about ten minutes I finished up mopping, and Minnie was still down in the pantry. She didn't specify what she needed to get, but I assumed it must have been a large quantity of...something. I also noticed the air of the kitchen smelled different. Not because the stove was off, and the smell of burning wood wasn't as noticeable, but it didn't smell as sweet, like honey, almost. In fact I felt like I'd been in some kind of dreamlike state in the kitch-
 
    Shit, Minnie's in heat, and that was her releasing pheromones...
    "Shitshitshitshitshit" I said as I opened the pantry door and made my way down.
 
    The pantry reeked of Minnie's sweet pheromones, and I began to feel lightheaded as I looked for her. The pantry was dark, the only light coming from the windows in the corner of it. And with sun not being out, it was virtually dark as night in here.
    In the actual pantry, beyond the hallway I was walking through, I could hear moans and incoherent ramblings coming from Minnie. As I got closer to where she was, I was able to make out what she was saying, as well as the smell of her pheromones becoming thicker, refusing to leave my nostrils. I had also noticed my pants had become considerably tighter. Last night I could smell the pheromones Alice was giving off, and it also made me lightheaded, but they weren't nearly as strong as what I got from Minnie. I felt bad for her, that she was getting it this bad, since it was my fault. Right near the pantry, I could make out what she had been saying.
    "M-master, I'm all yours...take me! Make me your bitch!" Along with more moans.
    As I turned the corner, Minnie was kneeling doggy-style, masturbating with her long black hair down. Oddly enough, she was still wearing her apron. I got a really good look at her this time, how her round sternum connected to her back and how it contoured against her thick ass, as it wiggled enticingly. I could see her rubbing her large tits with her front pair of arms, as well as playing with her pussy with her lower bottom hand, and holding herself up with her right bottom hand.
    It was quite the display, and my painfully bulging erection made sure I knew. When Minnie heard me step inside the pantry she snapped her head over to me, and instead of getting up and acting embarrassed like I thought she would, she crawled towards me on all six of her limbs, causing her ass to sway hypnotically as she did. She got as close as she could to me, and instead of getting up to talk, she pushed her face into my crotch, inhaling the smell of my erection, giggling like she was drunk. She began to fumble with my belt, causing me to step back at how forward the usually demure Minnie was being.
    "Mmmmaster...I've been a naughty slave...you caught me defiling my body...the body that *you* own..."
    I felt terrible at how her kinky display was turning me on. Everything about what she was doing made me want to jump her, pin her to the ground, and fuck her brains out. From the overwhelming pheromones, the way Minnie was shaking her ass, as well as putting her face into my cock, and the way she was talking...
    But I had to snap her out of it, she was in heat, and wasn't thinking rationally.
    While I mulled over what I was going to say, she'd successfully unbuckled my belt, and dropped my pants to the floor. My cock laid flat on her face, and she licked the bottom of the base of it. This immediately sent electricity throughout my body, Minnie began literally wrapping her tongue around my cock, and stroked it with her long organ. I moaned loudly at what she was doing, but once again the rational part of my mind kicked in. I nudged Minnie off of me. Assertively, but not where she'd be hurt.
    "Minnie! S-snap out of it! Y-you're not thinking!"
    But I don't think what I had said had gotten through to her, as she sat there seductively, pushing her breasts together with her top arms to form cleavage and distract me, and splayed out her short, thick yellow legs for me to get a full view of her engorged, needy cunt.
    "You're right, of course Master...how rude of a slave to force herself onto you! I need to be punished! I'm a horrible slave! Please! Please Master! take my body...use me however you want...I want to satisfy you..."
    Once again, Minnie got on all fours...sixes? and opened up her legs to give me a view of her fat ass and plump labia, opening her pussy up wide for me to enter her. I thought both her and I had gone totally insane, when it hit me.
     As messed up as it might seem, this must be what Minnie was into. Yes, she was in heat, but she wasn't totally out of control, she wasn't acting purely on impulse. She wanted this. And realizing that, I wanted it too. As she wiggled her ass and played with her pussy, I jumped on top of her, forcing her to the ground. She let out a surprised but happy moan as I did, grinding her plump behind into my cock. I obliged her, and spearheaded it directly into her aching pussy. It was wetter than any I'd ever been in before, and I sheathed my entire member into her with one thrust.
    Minnie had a quaking orgasm as I did, her head hitting the floor, moaning and babbling incoherently. With both hands, I dove into her rump, it gave easily as I kneaded it, while pounding away at Minnie. Her moans turned into guttural grunts, and I pounded her cunt as hard as I could.
    Minnie turned her head to look at me, still groaning like a bitch in heat...well, because she was.
    "Mah-Master-I've -hah- I've been a baaad slave. -hah- Spank me for being such a bad girl! Pleeease~!"
    I wasn't one to deny a woman what she wanted, and obliged her request as I continued fucking her senselessly.
    *SMACK*
    The fat of her ass wobbled delightfully as I hit her, albeit fairly lightly, on the rear.
    "Haaaarderrrr"
    *SMACK*
    This time, I spanked her twice as hard on the ass, eliciting a long moan from Minnie as I felt her cum again.
    "HARDER!"
    *SMACK*
    This one left a bright mark turning red on her, and Minnie yelled in ecstasy from being spanked.
    I was on the edge of cumming as well, and a devious idea ran through my head.
    I thrust into her as fast and as hard as I could, grunting like an animal while building a painfully fast tempo.
    Minnie's grunts had become more visceral and bestial, she was close to cumming once again as well.
    Taking both hands off each of her cheeks, I reigned down my hands hard, thunder-clapping each cheek with a loud
    *SMACK*
    Cumming violently inside Minnie's pussy.
    My bee-lover let out a loud shrieking orgasm, her head buried in the floor of the pantry as she came. Minnie was left almost hyperventilating with how shallow her breath had become, writhing on the floor.
   
 
    After we both came down from the highs of orgasm, I laid my head down beside Minnie, and she crawled into my arms, clutching to me closely. I looked into her eyes, unsure if I went too far or not, and if what I did was okay. But she was in total, peaceful bliss.
    "Thank you...for obliging me, Adrian."
    "No problem. To be honest, that's probably the best sex I've ever had. But, I'd never actually treat you like a slave, I love you, a lot, actually, Minnie.
    "And that's why it's fun, silly Master..." She said giggling while bringing her mouth to mine, kissing me slowly, and sweetly.
    "We're probably gonna have to close off the pantry for a while. It's gonna smell like sex for months...
    "Don't worry, I'm the only one whoever goes down here. Even Shelly's only been down here once or twice."
 
    With that said, we enjoyed basking in the afterglow of our lovemaking some more, Minnie bringing her fuzzy head into my neck, as I watched the rain hit the windows of the pantry outside.



Chapter XIII - Heaven Beside You
 
August 29th, 1858
 
    It had been three months since I first moved into the Folsom estate. It's had its ups, and its downs, but I felt like I'd gotten into a rhythm of how things went around here, and wasn't just making it up as I went along everyday. The tobacco stalks that survived the deluge in June stood tall and proud, towering over me at about eight feet tall on average for the hundreds of them. Next week it'd be time to harvest, and I'd be at my busiest before the fall came.
    But as I looked at one of the giant green plants, I felt nothing. Most people, who before had never had a green thumb, let alone planted a garden even, would well up with pride at what I'd accomplished, with the plantation now covered in the leafy giants, where plains had been before when I first arrived. But it left me empty. Planting was just something to do. Something to pass the time.
    The one thing that had brought me joy and a sense of accomplishment; writing, was now a daunting effort that tormented me. This had been the longest I'd ever gone without sending at least something out to my publisher, and I'd gotten a letter last month from them worried about me, if I was alright. I sent them back a vague response about how I had something big in the works. That, along with getting readjusted to my new life, would make it take a while. But I had nothing planned. I was out of ideas.
    I felt like my mental state was deteriorating because of it. Occasionally, I'd see things just out of the corner of my eye, like someone's watching me. At random intervals in the day, I hear an artillery shell scream out, as if it's coming in my direction. Being alone in my study is akin to my own personal hell, it's where the voices, the hallucinations, the demons that torment me haunt me the most. And so I completely avoid it. Because the worst demon of all, my father, is in there.
    I don't know how, but he's come back as a vengeful spirit, determined to make sure I never rest easy, that I never have a peaceful night, and that I can *never* truly be happy.
    It's damned if I do, damned if I don't. Yes, sleep didn't come easy to me if I slept on my own. Yes, I feel like I've been simply going through the motions of the day, sometimes not being able to tell which day is which. But these are things I can mitigate. I can handle them. I just need keep myself busy, keep providing for the five most beautiful women I've ever met, and then, I'll find happiness.
    That was the only time the voices voices stopped; when I was with them. When I'd play piano with Alice, or talk on the balcony with Shelly. When Esther and I would go into town to run errands, talking about this and that. When Minnie and I would sneak into the pantry, and even the few words Josie would exchange with me, all of these put my mind at ease.
    Now I only was able to get sleep if I shared a bed with one of them, although Esther and Josie had yet to show any romantic interest in me, which I was fine with. I won't force them if they don't want to. I'm not a monster.
    I've gotten good enough at planting that I don't need to think about what I'm doing. Which isn't good. My idle thoughts creep out into my mind, and the voices have become louder, and turn in hallucinations.
    Sometimes, it's Guido I see. He'll be half-buried in the spots I'm working in, where dirt's been moved, and I can see his morbid visage. He's rotting and desiccated, but it's still my fallen comrade. He calls out to me, he's beaten and bloodied, beckoning to me on why I didn't save him, why I didn't come to his funeral to comfort his mother. And I have no answer for him.
 Another time, it'll be the Austrian man I'd gutted. He speaks incoherently in German, his intestines falling out of him as he approaches me, a trail of blood behind him. He's crying, shaking me. I know little German, but when I see him, he repeats the same thing as he shakes me by the shoulders:
    "Wofr?"
    "Wofr!?
    "Meine Frau!"
    "Meine kinder!"
   
    And I can only look at him and cry with him, I told him I'm sorry, I plead with him, but he's incorrigible. I can't really say I blame.
   
    Thankfully today, the ghosts of my past had yet to come haunt me. But my mind was still ill at ease. I needed to write. I needed to get over this funk I was in, and I remembered what Shelly told me; that I could talk to her about anything. But I didn't need to burden her with my issues. I'm a man, I can overcome what's bothering me. Besides, what the hell do I have to worry about? I'm in perfect health, I have money, and I have the most wonderful ladies in the world that love me.
    ...And that's why it bothered me so much that I couldn't be happy. There are people out there that have missing legs, are impoverished, hell, are enslaved. What right do I have to be down and out?
    The sound of a glass bottle breaking interrupts my train of thought. That's odd, I don't know who else would be out here, unless Esther needed me for something, or Josie wanted to talk, which was doubtful. None of them carried around bottles either. Someone was on the property. I grabbed my pitchfork, and briskly walked over to the intruding noise. I thought I had the front gate locked, but I supposed a savvy thief could climb if he wanted to break in.
    "What the fu...?" Was all I could get out as I turned the corner behind one of the tall green giants. It was my father, sitting in a rocking chair. A bottle of booze in one hand, and a big fat cigar in the other. The way his overalls were unbuttoned at the top showed he'd just gotten off of work, and was enjoying himself. At my expense. He was laughing like a buffoon as he saw me enter his vision.
    The fucking nerve of him. Coming onto MY property, just to mock me? Does he think it's cute that he can have a drink, giggling like a little girl while I toil away? Not anymore. This was how I would end all my problems and make them go away. By standing up to him. I wasn't going to run away on a boat like I had when I was sixteen. This ended now.
    "What the fuck are you doing on my property, Dad?"
    "Hey now...is that any way to talk to your Old Man? I didn't raise you to be no dirty talkin' sailor faggot. Did I, Boy?"
    "You didn't raise me at all you drunkard. Now if you can't tell, I'm a little bit busy with work, go back to the bar and leave me alone."
    He simply laughed like I'd just told the funniest joke in the world. Rocking back and forth like a madman, then taking another long swig from the bottle he was holding.
    "You're full of shit, Boy. This ain't your work. I coulda done twice this much in half the time. Why don'tcha go back to writing your prissy little fairy tales?"
    "I-I can't, because you won't go away." I say to him, uneasiness starting to swell inside me.
    "Can't even move a goddamn hand? Boy, I knew you were a lazy bum, but I didn't know you were THAT lazy. You just let everyone do everything for ya, and when things get a teensy bit rough, ya run away. Just like ya ran away from yer Old Man on the first boat ya could find 'cuz ya couldn't handle some tough love."
    "Bullshit! You call beating me with a belt when you'd come because I'd ask for supper 'tough love'!? You're a lowlife drunk! At least I actually made something of myself and fought for our homeland!" I said, pointing at him, anger building up, my eyes started to burn, and my face became hot.
    "Heh, I heard about what ya did in Venezia. You're such a shitty soldier that you got caught by a couple a damn Krauts...Yeah, you sure made something of yourself son, I'm REEEEAL proud of ya." He clapped with faux applause with the bottle still in his hands as he mocked me, took another long swig, and once he noticed it was empty, chucked the brown glass bottle at me.
    That was the final straw, I was going to man up and make him leave, and all my problems would go away...
    "Dad. Get the fuck off of my property."
    He scratched his chin for a second, then smiled deviously at me. I could see his yellow rotting teeth, or at least the ones that were still in his mouth.
    "No."
    "This is the last time I'm gonna ask nicely. Get. The fuck. Out."
    "Why don'tcha make me, if you're such a big man, Boy?" He said with that same rotten smile on his face. He got up from his chair, and towered over me, at least seven feet tall, if not more. As I looked up at him, I dropped my pitchfork, unbuttoned my shirt, and took off my hat.
    "Fine by me. You don't know long I've wanted to kick your ass you fucking wretch."
    I threw the first punch, but he dodged it easily, it was telegraphed and slow. Even as he drunkenly swayed from side to side, it was as if he knew my every move.
    I went for a left hook, but once again, no dice. I threw another right. Another left. Why wasn't anything connecting!?
    I was out of breath, sweat dripped from my forehead, but he didn't look any worse for wear. He gave another one of his sneering smiles that pissed me off, and I could tell he was going on the offensive.
    I braced for what was to come, but he did the opposite of what I expected. I thought he'd go left, but delivered a right uppercut directly under my chin, I could feel my lower jaw crush into my upper, and the taste of blood trickled in my mouth from having bit my lip. I held my chin with my right hand, but as I was distracted, at the last second a fist come directly at my left eye.
    The strike was so hard it knocked me to the ground. I could feel my eye begin to swell shut, I writhed in pain, trying to catch my breath.
   
    "Get up, Boy."
    I could do nothing but sit in the dirt, even after all these years, after having gotten stronger from working the fields, I still couldn't beat him.
    "I said, GET UP BOY!
     I then felt a sharp pain attack my stomach, and I screamed out in pain. He kicked with all his might in the gut, and knocked the wind out of me. I could only lay there holding onto my stomach, as my father towered over me.
    "That's right. You ain't no man. You're just a dumb kid who never learned anythin' his Old Man taught him. I reckon I'm gonna take those bugs ya got in that house, and have me a lil' fun with them before takin' them to the slave auction. Y'know how much money I could get for them, Boy?"
    He bent over to look down as he continued to mock me. But that lit a fire in my gut. The thought of anyone harming the women I loved burned me up more than anything. I got up, and charged towards him, with everything I had.
    "RAAAAAAAAAAHHH!!! I HATE YOU! I HATE YOU! I HATE YOU!"
    I punched wildly, erratically. I was no longer human. I was a wild, cornered animal acting purely on instinct. But as hard and fast as I charged at him, he stepped back, narrowly avoiding each fist I flung at him. Swaying back and forth, with that same smug grin on his ugly, stupid face.
    I was so caught up in trying to tear his throat out, I didn't see the incoming left hook headed directly for my nose. It stopped me dead in my tracks, and I collapsed like an old building being demolished. Down goes Adrian.
    Blood ran down my face from my nose like a geyser. My eye had now shut from being swollen, and my jaw hurt like hell. He won. Even though I was grown man, I still couldn't beat him.
    Out of my right eye, I could see that he was now hunching over me, and grabbed me by the collar of my undershirt, puling me close to him forcefully with his greasy hairy hand.
    I could smell the alcohol on his breath as he brought his face uncomfortably close to mine.
    "'s time to say your prayers, Boy, it's bedtime." He cocked back his left hand, and resigned myself to my fate, closing my right eye shut, hoping I wouldn't feel the brunt of the hit before I got knocked out.
   
    Before I felt the punch come, a large pair of hands grabbed my shoulders from behind, and shook me as hard as they could, the hand coming off of my collar.
    "ADRIAN!!! WHAT IN GOD'S NAME HAS GOTTEN INTO YOU!?"
    As I'm brought back to reality, Shelly turns me around, she's absolutely horrified as she looks at me. Her mouth is wide open, feelers moving chaotically, like she didn't know what on Earth I was doing.
    "What good reason could you POSSIBLY have to be beating the shit out of yourself, Adrian!?" That was the first time I heard Shelly swear.
    I looked around the area of the field I was sitting in, and my father was gone. So was the rocking chair. The only thing in view was my hat, shirt, and pitchfork I'd dropped on the ground.
    "M-muh-my dad...he was just hear, I-I-i was fighting him...Protecting you-all..."
    Shelly could do nothing but shake her head as she looked down at me.
    "Adrian, your father's dead, remember? You told us that the first night!"
    "N-no...he came back...out here...i-in the fields, haunting m-me. S-same w-with Guido a-and thuhAustumam..."
    After getting out my reasoning for fighting, my head became lighter and lighter, and the world went black.
 
 
    Stirring back to reality, I began to open eyes, or rather, my right eye. The first thing I noticed was how much my head was throbbing. I looked around, and saw I was inside the house. Shelly's bedroom, specifically. As I looked around, Minnie and Alice had their heads down by my right hand, Alice stroking it with her fuzzy chitinous fingers.
    I turned my head to the left and saw Shelly stroking my hand with hers, looking at it forlornly.
    I looked up and saw Esther and Josie, both of them with both pairs of their arms crossed, looking down at the floor. As I stirred awake, I turned back to Shelly.
    "Hey." I said meekly.
    She looked over to me, and smiled with a motherly warmth. "Thank goodness you're awake, Sweetheart, didn't know how long you'd be out. You lost a lot of blood back there.
    "Yeah...sorry you had to see that." I was ashamed, thinking back to what Shelly probably saw. Me being a total idiot punching myself in the face, imagining my dead father was doing it.
    "Esther and Josie called over to me from the house when they heard yellin' in the field. When we went over to where you where an' saw you, I just...I just didn't know what to do. I thought you were gone. Mentally."
    "I'm sorry. It's just..."
    "Shhh, it's okay, you don't have to talk about it right now, if you don't want to." She said, putting a chitinous finger to my lips.
    But I *do* need to talk to you Adrian. Alone."
    I simply nodded my head, looking down at my chest.
    Shelly then got up on her six legs to say something to the rest of the ladies.
    "If ya'll don't mind, I need to talk with Master Adrian, just me an' him."
    The girls obliged. One by one, they came up to me, hugged me, gave me a kiss on the cheek or the forehead, then left the room. The last one standing there was Josie. She moved uncomfortably looking off to the side, brushing her short black hair with a hand as she approached me. She knelt down, and hugged me tighter than I'd ever been hugged before.
    "Please get better." She whispered in my ear, I could hear Josie sniffle as she got the words out. After putting me down, she got out of the room as fast she could, shutting the down behind her.
    That just left me and Shelly. The brown spider climbed into her bed beside me, holding out her arms to hold me tightly, I laid my head on her bosom. She began to stroke my hair, and as I moved my hand up to feel my left eye, I felt the bandage that covered it. Shelly grabbed my hand, and held onto it tightly. We stayed like this for several minutes, then Shelly broke the silence.
    "Adrian Galliano, I know you're a good man. I know you're not a liar. But you made me a promise. You promised me that if something was botherin' you, you'd talk to me about it. I'd say what happened today was a little more than somethin' botherin' you. Don't you think?"
    "Yeah..." I said turning my head. I felt guilty for letting her down. Letting everyone down. My stupid problems got in the way of their lives, making them drop everything just for me.
    "It's just that, I didn't want to be a burden to you. I didn't want you to have to worry about me..."
    Shelly sighed deeply, and held onto me even tighter, embracing me further. "Adrian, when I see the owner of the estate killing himself, trying to put himself in a hospital, that's when it becomes more than just your problem. It's OUR problem, as a family. If something happened to you, who knows what would happen to the estate? What would happen to the girls?"
    That's what really did me in. Made the pit in my stomach become even heavier. That my dumb depression could become even harmful to them. The people I cared about the most. I felt a lump form in my throat, and I couldn't say anything, so I let Shelly continue holding me.
    "Now I can't force whatever's heavy on your heart out of ya, but when you're ready, you need to talk to me about this. I'll stay here with you the rest of the night, and I'll wait for you. When you're ready." She brought her head down, kissing the top of my head as she spoke.
    "But whatever it is, whatever you're feelin' guilty about. Adrian, it's not your fault."
    I muttered something as she held me. I loved Shelly, but she was wrong. It's all my fault. The whole reason she's in this mess. The reason why Guido died. Why my father was drunk, it's al-
    "It's not your fault." She said again. Clinging onto me tighter this time, Shelly held each of my hands in hers as she whispered to me in my ear.
    "It's not your fault."
    "Shelly, please yo-"
    "It's not your fault."
    The lump in the back of my throat became even larger. I could feel my eyes well up as she held me tightly. Loved me. No matter who, or what I was, she loved me. All of them loved me.
    "It's not your fault."
    My lips began to quiver, my nose sniffled as I tried to breath threw it, and tears began to stain my face. She was right. She was totally, completely right.
    "It's not your fault."
    There's no way I could have stopped Guido from perishing. Or prevented the Austrian man from dying. Or even keeping my father from being rotten. I was now bawling my eyes out as Shelly rocked me back and forth in her loving embrace, I could feel her own tears stream down on my head as she held me.
    "I-it's not your fault."
    That's when the floodgates opened. I bawled and sobbed. Wept like an infant child, being held in their mother's arms. I don't know for how long, but I cried harder than I'd ever cried before. I was incoherent mess as I exercised all the pain, all the demons that had been tormenting me, out of my body. Shelly held onto me the entire time, being my lifeline, my connection to the real world.
    After a while, I was able to somewhat compose myself, and looked up at Shelly. I could see she had tear stains on her cheeks, but she looked as beautiful as ever. I hugged her back tightly, I was still sniffling and quivering a little bit, but was able to get out coherent thoughts.
    "T-thank you Shelly. For everything. I-I think I'm ready to fulfill my promise now-"
    "You already did, Sweetheart. I felt it. It may not have been words, but you said what was on your heart. It's okay now." Smiling as she looked down at me, her hair covering her face somewhat.
   
    "I love you, Adrian. All of us love you. Don't ever forget that."
 
 
 
Chapter XIV - Reborn
 
September 2nd, 1858
 
    The sun beat down as I worked, cutting the large tobacco leaves to be harvested. Because there was a relatively small window to harvest the tobacco as it would get too cold by October, Josie and Esther offered to help cut leaves with me to be taken to a manufacturer into town who'd turn them into cigarettes to be smoked.
    Over the past couple days, the two of them had been great help. I figured we had maybe a couple hundred stalks left that needed to be cut down, which could all be done today.
    After finishing up the section I was working on, I carried the leaves I had onto the trailer hitched to a wagon in the middle of the plantation's road. I'd need to head to town tomorrow to meet with the cigarette roller I'd been in correspondence with, and had setup to meet with him in his office in town. I'd need to ask Esther if she'd come with me, I hoped she wasn't too busy now that she was helping me cull the tobacco...
    I took off my hat, and brushed the sweat off my brow. It really was hot out, but it didn't seem to bother Esther or Josie. I guess that was one of the benefits of having an exoskeleton, they didn't seem to sweat. Speaking of Josie, she walked up to the trailer and set her leaves down into it as well, seeming to pay no mind to me. That was, until she pulled a small cloth bag out of her rucksack, and tossed it in my direction. I fumbled with it in the air, as I wasn't expecting her to throw something to me, but caught it.  As I peered inside, it was an assortment of nuts, dried fruit, and cured strips of meat that had been salted.
    "Lunch time." She said walking over to a large tree with for shade.
    I followed her in tow, my eyes drawn to her backside as it naturally swayed while Josie walked. Although she and Esther wore similar overalls, Josie cut the legs off of hers, I suppose to make it easier to move around when she hunted. Her overalls were also tighter and more form fitting to her figure, making her tight, athletic ass that much more pronounced.
    I sat down next to Josie, putting my hat off to the side and screwing off the lid of my leather canteen, taking a long drink of water. I was't sure where Esther had gone, she didn't appear to still be working. Perhaps she went back to her cabin to cool off and eat. I was a little concerned, as even though I cared about Josie a lot, she also intimidated me quite a bit. She was taller, and probably a lot stronger than I am, and her demeanor was aloof, like she didn't really seem to care one way or another that I was here. Except that one night after my breakdown...
    I suppose it was better than her original attitude towards me when I first got here; disdain for my existence, and outright refusing to talk to me. I suppose I could 'cowboy up' as they say down here in Virginia, and get comfortable with being uncomfortable, eating in silence with Josie.
    That is until she broke the silence, and turned around so that she faced me, and we could see each other eye to eye.
    "What was you life like before you left for Italy, Adrian?" She posited to me quizzically, but continued to munch on her food.
    "Not good. My mom died after giving birth to me, and my dad was well, he's the main reason why I left."
    A month, hell, even a week ago, I wouldn't even think about entertaining this question and would dance around it. But ever since Shelly gave me an intervention, my outlook on it was different. I wouldn't necessarily say I was "over" all the guilt, fear, and pain I carried with me for over ten years, but I had a new perspective on what had happened in my life, and was beginning to accept it for what it was.
    "I guess, looking back on it, my dad fell into a kind of downward spiral after my mom died. I can't think of a time when he wouldn't come home drunk off his ass, and I suppose I can somewhat sympathize with him now. That doesn't excuse him beating me, but he was just a sad, pathetic man who lost the love of his life and didn't know how to continue on..."
    "When did he beat you?"
    "Anytime I spoke to him pretty much. Usually it'd be because of starving from not getting any food for supper. I learned pretty quickly how to scavenge the dumpsters of Boston for anything remotely edible. That, and how pickpocket for change from people."
    "I can kinda relate." She said, rubbing her shoulder with her lower arm, and running a hand through her short hair.
     How do you mean?" I asked, putting a handful of dried fruit in my mouth.
    "I never knew my parents. I was born here on Folsom, and my dad was just one of the drones in the fields. My mom, she was supposedly one of the brood-mothers, 'cuz I had twenty or so brothers and sisters, and she died kinda like yours did."
    "I held a lot of resentment, to well, pretty much anyone who wasn't a bug. Assumed all other anthros and humans were just out there to take advantage of us, thought we were dumb, couldn't think for ourselves. I'd try to fly off the plantation fairly often, but they'd always catch me. Your uncle would put me in a hot-box, a large iron box that holds you down, and they'd put it where the sun was at its highest in the middle of the day, baking you inside of it."
    "Jesus...couldn't you ever, I dunno, fight back?
    Josie shook her head. "Now, yes. Back then, I was too young. What they didn't know is that us wasps, God made us tough as nails. They'd beat me often, and it hurt at times, but I learned that they couldn't do too much lasting damage. I just wish they didn't take away all our stingers when we're first born. No offense, but there were times I'd have liked to stick it right in your uncle's ass."
    "I can't say I blame you."
    "Even though I learned to deal with the pain, it still made me hate humans. Every one that I'd see that Mr. Folsom invited over, they were all scum. I remember seeing one man take his mistress ant-anthro out back, broke two of her arms because she wouldn't go down on him, and raped her anyway."
    "That's terrible. It really pisses me off that people think they can just do that. You didn't ever have anything like that happen...did you?" I asked, dreading what her response might be.
    Josie just stared down blankly at her bag of food.
    "Shit, Josie, I didn't mean to bring it up I-"
    "I was fourteen. It happened in the house when I was cleaning something, one of the paid workers came inside, he was a wolverine-anthro. He came up behind me and grabbed me, fondled me. I wasn't sure what to do. I was scared, didn't know if anyone would help me. He only touched my body a bit, he didn't take my maidenhood. But he did make me touch his...penis until climax.
That's what made me not trust anyone besides bugs."
    Josie then pulled the cap off of her canteen, and took a sip of water.
    "I'm really sorry that happened. I guess I get why you would think I'm just some...I dunno pervert wanting to buy the house just to fulfill some sick sexual desires."
    "Are you saying you *don't* do that?" She said, cocking her head and smiling coyly.
    "W-what do you mean?"
    "C'mon, there's no need to be shy, I can smell you and Minnie's lovemaking in the pantry from the barn."
    "Heh-heh, yeah..." My face burnt up from blushing hearing Josie describe Minnie and I's romps in the pantry.
    "If you were worried about that, Josie, I would *never* force you, or any of them to have sex with me."
    "It's not that I don't think about it...it's hard to deny pheromones. But you probably think I'm ugly. I'm bowlegged, the way wasps are made, I always look like I have a scowl on my face...I'm thin and shaped like a boy..."
    "That's nonsense. You're beautiful Josie. You've got that rugged tomboy charm to you, and it's pretty cute, I think."
    Josie gave another half-smile, her antennae drooping down. I reached out to hold her hand, but as if on reflex, she pulled it back away from me, and I put my hand back in my lap, reacting to her sudden movement.
    "Sorry..."
    "No, I should be sorry. You're a great guy Adrian. It's just that...I have to take time to get comfortable with people. But I'll let be sure to let you know when I'm ready~" Josie said as she got up from sitting in the grass. She gave me a wink, blew me a kiss before walking away. It almost looked like she was intentionally swaying her hips more as she walked back towards the field.
    These women are gonna be the end of me...
 
 
September 3rd, 1858
 
    I knocked on Esther's cabin door. The night prior, I asked her if she'd be able to take me into town, and she was nice enough to do so. It was fairly early in the morning, but it took us about an hour to fly into town, and I didn't want to be away from the estate for too long.
    The door opened with a creak, and out walked Esther, wearing a nice blue sundress instead of her overalls, with her orange hair down. It accentuated her Monarch butterfly coloration, and really made her stand out, looking totally stunning. I probably gawked a little bit as she stepped out of her cabin, but good lord almighty did she look good.
    Noticing my ogling, Esther laughed slightly. "Are you ready to go, Master Adrian~?"
    "Uh, yeah. Ready when you are." I said trying to not to stare at her. But it was a herculean effort, the dress contoured to her body in all the right places, it accentuated her lithe ass, and made her large bust that much more noticeable.
    While in the air, I could hear Esther humming something lightly to herself, but I didn't notice the tune. It was one of the most amazing things I'd ever felt in the world, being in the air. By where we were on the road, I could see we were about halfway from the edge of town.
    Esther adjusted one of her lower arms, getting it dangerously close to the crotch of my pants. I thought about saying something, but I couldn't really adjust my neck to look up at her, and thought against it. She then moved her hand down even further, where her hand was now planted directly where my cock was in my trousers. I tensed up as she did, are momentum jerking slightly in the air as I did. Esther seemed to not notice or care, and continued humming to herself, while at the same time, moving her hand in circular motions over my crotch.
    Was she trying to get me off?...in mid-flight? I knew Esther was the free spirit, take things as they come type, but was this really the right time? It's not like she'd indicated to me at anytime before that she was interested in me. Those pheromones must be something fierce.
    She was agonizingly slow. The circles she made were very intentional, as if she was trying to get me to being fully erect right when we'd land at the town's gates. I swear, this woman was the Devil.
    By the time we got close to the gates of the town, we descended towards them, and Esther grabbed onto the bulge in my pants firmly. She had gotten me breathing shallow as she slowly rubbed. I came close to cumming as we descended, but as if being able to read my mind, she took her hand off of my crotch.
    And she was still humming that same damn tune.
    Esther put me down gently, as we hit land. She gracefully descended back onto her feet, and dusted herself off lightly, smiling warmly at me.
    "You look a little flustered, Master Adrian...I wonder why that could be~" Fluttering her eyes at me.
    "L-let's just get this over with..." I said, with walking becoming more difficult with the large erection in my pants, it was more akin to a waddle.
 
    As we walked through downtown, Esther surprised me by hooking her two right arms under my left arm, holding me close. I wasn't sure what this gesture of affection was for, but I definitely appreciated it.  Could she tell I was nervous? I still wasn't used to walking through the busy town, I was out of my element. I could see anthros and humans of all kinds staring at Esther and I, and it bothered me. Didn't they have places to be? Why did they need to gawk at us?
    Eventually, I found the address to the cigarette manufacture's office, and stepped inside. It was small, looked like a building he only used every once in a while, with a spartan layout. The man in question looked to be a cat-anthro, he had short brown hair, and was busy writing something down when Esther and I stepped in.
    Looking up in my direction, he gave a curt smile. "You must be Mr. Galliano."
    "I am." I said, bending over his desk to shake his paw. As he looked over up at Esther, he did a double take, but smiled back at me. "Normally I'd ask my clients to keep their bugs outside, but since this one's pretty easy on the eyes, I'll let it slide."
    And I let the cat-man's comment slide. I didn't really feel like blowing up a business opportunity just because of an offhanded comment.
    "I am Sylvester Axelrod, owner of Axelrod Cigarettes. Please, take a seat Mr. Galliano."
    "So, let's get down to business. You have three hundred pounds of tobacco leaves ready to be harvested, and along with needing to have one of my people come pick it up, I'll offer you, oh... how does an even one hundred dollars sound?"
    I was shocked at the number he offered. A hundred dollars was way more than I expected to get for my rather meager share. But, if tobacco was in high demand, I wasn't going to complain about it. We could live off of that for at lest the rest of the year with how self-sufficient the estate already was.
    "Mr. Axelrod, you've got yourself a deal." I said, shaking his paw once more.
    "Excellent! The Folsom Estate used to be the king of Virginia when your uncle was alive, it's a shame you don't have the capacity to put up the numbers he did."
    "Oh and by the way, I'd get as many big strong male bugs you can, and quick, I don't know if you've kept up with the news, but all the talk in Washington is these abolitionists wanting to take away our right to own our property! Can you believe that?"
    "No, I guess the times are changing." I said rolling my eyes internally.
 
    We made our way back to the entrance of the town. As we flew in air, by the look of where the sun was in the sky, tt was about noon, and my stomach began rumbling. Esther overheard must have overheard it, and smirked, descending back to the ground, in a field by a tree. As we landed, Esther pulled off her rucksack, and gathered a few things by the tree.
    I figured since it's such a nice day out, we could have a little picnic before heading back home, don't you agree, Master Adrian?"
    "Yeah, a picnic would be lovely."
    I helped Esther lay down a blanket in the grass, and she pulled out an assortment of fruits from her orchard. Esther said they were freshly picked yesterday, and I believed her. They were all delicious, from bananas, apples, oranges, all of it was great.
    "Master Adrian, there's something I've been meaning to ask you." Esther said, making a circle in the blanket with her finger as laid on it, holding her head up with one of her upper arms.
    "Sure, what do you want to know?" I asked, taking a bite of a crisp bright red apple.
    "Do you not...desire me?" She said with a look of concern on her face. "I've seen the looks of contentedness all the girls in the house have, and I know you've been with by smelling you. I don't want to say it's jealousy but...am I not...pretty?"
    "No, that's not it at all! You're...you're gorgeous, Esther. It's just that, well, I don't want to force myself on you, it'd be uncouth of me to take you like I'm some kind of beast."
    Esther sighed with a warm smile at my words, bringing her upper pair of arms to her heart. "Such a gentleman you are, Master. And a gentle soul. How lucky I am to be yours~"
    In one quick motion Esther then swooped on top of me, lightly pinning my arms to the blanket smiling sweetly, her eyes half-lidded.
    She brought her face close to mine, and I caught her scent in my nose, it smelled like citrus, it was quite intoxicating.
    "I hope you don't mind if I, force myself on you, Master~" She whispered into my ear in melodious, delicate voice.
    With that she pursed her full black lips together, and kissed me. It was a sweet kiss at first, but then I felt Esther's long tongue invade my mouth. It was like she licking every square inch of it, to taste me as much as she could. After about a minute of sweet mouth-torture, she relented and looked down at me. I had to catch my breath for a minute, because it turns it's hard to breath when you have a long foreign organ in your throat.
    Esther then slid my pants off, along with my underwear, letting my hard-on see the light of day and stand proud in the air. Esther removed her sundress, and neatly folded it next to my pants, as well as removing my shirt. I noted that she wasn't wearing anything underneath her dress besides satin white stockings that contrasted against her dark, fuzzy body.
    As Esther knelt on top of she pushed her hair back with her top set of arms, giving me a nice view of her large, wondrous breasts. They were the same color as the rest of her skin, charcoal grey, almost completely black; with her nipples a lighter shade of grey. She then bent over and pressed her mountainous chest into my face, rubbing up and down, as well as massaging my cock with the labia in the same motion, these dual sensations taking my breath away with how amazing they felt.
    "Master, you've been working sooo hard to care of us...I think you deserve a break. Don't you? Let me handle everything...~"
    With that being said, Esther reached down grabbed a hold of my member, positioning it directly into her wet pussy.
    The feeling of my cock being engulfed in a velvety warm, wet prison caused me to shiver in delight. Esther grabbed onto my head and positioned her breast for me to suck on it. I of course reciprocated, holding the hardening nipple in my mouth and making circles around the areola. Esther cooed and hummed at my ministrations, and lowered herself further down on my shaft, until we were connected at the hips, and her firm butt sat on my pelvis.
    Esther closed her eyes and sighed happily as she sat on top of me, content with just the feeling of being filled up by cock.
    Since she had let go of my hands, I couldn't help myself, and planted a hand on on each of her ass-cheeks. I gave them a gentle squeeze, seeing how much they would give under my hands, causing Esther's back to shoot up straight, moaning lightly at my touch.
    She began moving up and down, building up a slow, but steady rhythm on top of me.
    I removed by mouth from her breast as she sat up straight, and enjoyed the show that was going on above me. Esther her arched her spine to where her tits were on fully display, holding herself up by grabbing onto my thighs.
    She said to let her do all the work, but I couldn't help naturally bucking into her needy pussy. When she would go up, I would go down, and then we'd meet in the middle, our hips connected once more.
    Now, we built up a steady quicker tempo, Esther gyrating her hips onto my pelvis, and I thrusting upwards into hers.
    Her mouth was agape, her long, thin tongue hanging out of her mouth, eyes half-lidded, staring up at the tree above us.
    I could tell she was close to cumming, she was losing her grip on my thighs, and began to slouch as I pumped faster into her now totally slick vagina.
    Feeling that I was also close, Esther moved closer back down to me, grabbing onto my hands her top pair of arms, our fingers intertwining.
    Her bottom pair held my face, forcing me to look directly into her soft, white eyes.
    "Haah, Master, you're doing so well...I want you to cum with me, I need to feel you fill me..!" Esther whisper-moaned to me.
    Not one to deny a lady what she wants, I picked up the pace even more,  putting as much force as I could behind each and every pump, I was sweating, my breath became shallow, my nose was filled with the smell of citrus fruit, and I could hear the lewd slick smacking of my cock into her pussy.
    With one hard, deep, final thrust, I went as far into Esther as I physically could, my cum spraying out like a geyser from the tip of cock, covering her velvety walls in my seed.
    Esther slammed down in kind, her whole body shaking, she collapsed into my arms, letting out breathy high pitched moans as she came. Her head moved on top of mine, and I felt her snake-like tongue pry my lips open, forcing its way into my mouth.
    We kissed for what felt like an eternity, holding hands, and each other in our arms.
    But eventually, the comedown from orgasm came, and Esther laid her head on my chest, right by my still rapidly beating heart.
    "Thank you Master...Thank you for loving me."
    "And thank you for loving *me*..."
    "Y'know, I don't think anyone back home is in any rush to see us, let's enjoy the picnic a little bit longer."
    Esther giggled at that, kissing me on the cheek, and hugged me tightly.




Chapter XV - Pushit
 
October 14th, 1858
 
    The cool autumn breeze gently danced through the window as I set in my study. It seemed I had been practically living in this room all month. Furiously, I put my pen to paper, barely taking any time to stop. My breakthrough moment came after Mr. Axelrod and a few of his people came to pick up the tobacco leaves that Esther, Josie and I had cut. He genuinely seemed surprised at how the ladies of the estate conducted themselves; that they were well-spoken, and thoughtful.
    He had told me that his experience with insect-anthros was that he thought they were lethargic, needed to be guided with a strong and swift hand, them being drones and mindless, they wouldn't respond any other way in his mind. It astonished me that he only see them as that, but as I thought about it, if he'd only known insects to act that way, and had been taught that insects were slave races, than of course he would only think of them as such.
    After hearing this, it struck me that many Americans probably insect-anthros this way; and as an author, I felt I had a duty to write about my experiences here on the Folsom estate, and explain that they were not mindless beasts. That the insect-anthros I knew were more than that, they were thinking, feeling, sentient beings like me. They had hopes and dreams just like I. It was then that I rushed to write to my publisher in New York about my idea for my next book:
 
 
             
                October 3rd, 1858 AD
                New York City, New York
               
                To Mister Dean Rosenhaus,
 
                I apologize for shirking my responsibilities in sending my work, but I do feel my reasons are valid.
                For my next work, I plan on making something big. I believe along with Miss Stowe's novel from
                seven years ago, it will show that the institution of slavery is archaic, anti-American, and that insects
                are just as much Americans as you or I. Over the past several months, I have lived with a few women
                who are insect anthros, and technically my 'slaves', though I do not treat them as such. I believe the
                average American would be shocked to learn that insects are thinking, feeling beings as much as humans,
                mammal-anthros, avian-anthros, and reptile-anthros. They have enriched my life in ways you could not imag-
                ine. Perhaps if Americans got to see them how I see them, they would think differently about our garish
                tradition of slavery.
 
 
 
                                                                                                        Yours truly.
                                                                                                        Adrian Galliano  
 
 
    Once I got a letter confirming that he indeed would be interested in publishing a book like this, I immediately got to work. All month, I've worked tirelessly into the night, sleeping little, eating sparsely, only focusing on my book. Shelly occasionally checked on me to make sure I wasn't having another 'episode', but I believe she saw that the effort on this was not done out of insanity, but determination. Determination to show my fellow Americans that insect-anthros were just as much Americans as they were, through my experience of living with a few of them. In the book, I go into detail about each lady in particular, about their experiences prior to me moving in, and each of their skills and talents. How Shelly is the best maid I've ever had, Alice's gift of playing piano, Minnie's abilities as a chef, Esther's gardening and skill of managing an orchard, and Josie's knack for hunting. And how these were not things I had forced them into doing, but roles they naturally fit in to make the estate run properly.
    One thing I did however omit were my romantic involvements with them. Not because I'm ashamed for loving them despite them not being human, but because I do owe them that amount of privacy, and, it would be highly inappropriate for the message I'm trying to get out to the American public.
   
    I went up to my balcony later in the evening and enjoyed the cool night air. Esther wouldn't be able to take me into town tomorrow because of her responsibilities with her garden and orchard, getting them ready for the winter. That meant I'd have to get up before dawn in the morning, something I was particularly looking forward to. As I basked in the moonlight of the evening, I hard a feint buzzing from below that continued to rise in sound, and to my surprise, saw Josie floating up to my balcony next to me. She shifted around anxiously as she looked at me, giving a weak smile and wave.
    "Good evening, Josie, what brought up here this late?" I asked, smiling back at her warmly.
    "Well, I, uh...I thought since Esther's busy tomorrow that, well...maybe I could take you into town?" She spit her words out fairly quickly, as if she was embarrassed at what she was asking.
    "Oh, well, you don't have to do that. I shouldn't to have to burden you with doing that since you've got your chores around the barn and-"
    "I can get up earlier and do them!" She exclaimed at me, her eyes going wide. It was quite the rare sight to see Josie showing this much emotion.
    "Well, if you insist, I suppose I can't brush you away." I said, getting up since it was getting pretty late and I'd be needing to go to bed soon.
    "I guess I'll meet you by the barn first thing in the morn-"
    As I got up, Josie grabbed me, and pulled me into her for a deep hug, burying her head into my neck. Like with the emoting, I wasn't used to this kind of affection from the wasp-woman, but it wasn't unappreciated. I reciprocated, and held onto her tightly, holding her lithe back.
    "Good night...Adrian."
    "Good night Josie."
    And with that,just as quickly as she had pulled me in, she gently pushed me away and flew back down to the barn. In spite of her tough exterior and demeanor, she really was a sweet girl. It just took her a little while to get to know people, because of how her time here before I got to the Folsom estate went. It took her awhile to warm up to people she didn't know. But I'm glad she was warming up to me, as I cared deeply about her. These thoughts brought a smile to my face as I retired to bed, ready to get my manuscript sent off to New York.
 
 
October 15th, 1858
 
    As Josie and I approached the front of the town, I could tell she was incredibly nervous. Her antennae were moving around erratically, and she put a hand through her hair, which I had learned from watching Josie, that was a nervous tick of hers.
    "Hey, Josie. If you don't want to, you don't have to go into town with me." I smiled reassuringly as I looked up to her, grabbing her hand and holding as I spoke.
    She startled at me grabbing her hand, but seemed to settle down at my touch.
    "Are...are you sure?"
    "Yeah, I know where the post-office is, and I'm just going to run over there quickly. It won't take me very long, I promise. I'll call out to you when I'm back, okay?"
    "Alright. Thank you, Adrian." Telling her she didn't have to come to town with me seemed to calm Josie down, as she wasn't fidgeting around as much.
    "There's a meadow not too far from there if you want to go over there." I said, fondly recalling my memory of Esther and I's 'picnic' in the meadow in question.
    Josie pulled me in for another hug, but not as forceful as the one last night, although it was still a nice gesture coming from the usually less than affectionate wasp. We then went our separate ways, Josie flying out into the treeline, and me heading into town.
 
 
    As I left the post-office, I had noticed that I received a lot less stares from passersby now that I didn't have Esther with me. It still irked me that people looked at her like she was some kind of alien being, but I supposed change came at a glacial pace for people. Walking out of the building, I saw a fat bulldog enter my view. I looked at him, and he looked back at me. I could see the gears turn in his head as he tried to recall my name, and when he did, his face lit up.
    "Adrian Galliano! How are you doing, sir?" John Tavern said as he waddled over to me, holding up a stubby paw for me to shake with my hand.
    "I'm doing quite well John, how about you?"
    "Likewise. Enjoying life as it is. Hey now, it's been quite the spell since we last spoke, and I was wondering if you'd join me for lunch at Stockton's?"
    Stockton's was a small eatery here in town. I had planned to just eat lunch back home, but I suppose it wouldn't hurt to try something here in town. Though I thought about the last time I met up with John, and it wasn't exactly cordial. Especially with how he spoke about slaves. But I suppose he was probably like Mr. Axelrod, and that's all he knew about insects. Perhaps I was overreacting then.
    "John, I'd love to join you for lunch."
    "Good man! Here-follow me, I'll get us there in a jiffy!" He said waddling away.
 
    As we sat at our table and ate, we didn't get much talking done at first. It was mainly us eating, or rather, me sipping on my light chicken noodle soup, and watching John gorge himself on a steak, potatoes, and a bowl of beans. It was a little disgusting, to be honest. The only time he paused from wolfing down his steak was to wipe his mouth with the bin around his chubby neck. After finishing the steak, he looked over at where I was sitting across from him, his eyes widened like he forgot I was there.
    "Excuse me, Adrian. But I do love a good steak." He said, wiping his lip once more.
    It looked to me like he enjoyed more than just one good steak, but that was neither here nor there.
    "I asked you to join me for lunch because well, I don't see you too often in town, and wanted to know how you're liking it on the estate, how things are going, that sort of thing."
    "Things are going well, I've had a great time with the ladies that stayed behind on the estate, and they've made living there much more enjoyable. As for my time in Virginia, I like it quite a bit. I actually came into town to drop off my manuscript for my next book, to send it up to New York to my publisher.
    "Ah yes! You are a writer, as I remember you tellin' me. That's excellent that you've gotten back into your rhythm. I hope I'm not prying, but what is your book about?" The bulldog asked inquisitively.
    "It's about my time at the estate, actually. About the women that live there, about how they're no different than us." I stated as a matter of fact.
    "Are you serious Mr. Galliano? All bugs I've ever met were ones in the fields, and they're not the best for conversation mind you."
    "I think, maybe if you gave them the time of day, they very well might be. The past several months I've lived here, I've learned that insect-anthros have dreams, they think, they feel, just like we do, John. And I think if more people realized that they're not just mindless drones, if they weren't treated that way, people might be surprised." I said, taking a sip from my mug of coffee.
    "You mean to tell me that you own slaves, but, don't treat them as slaves...if I'm following you correctly?"
    "Well, it's not like they don't do anything. They all have their own specific jobs that they're good at, for example, a wasp-girl that lives with me is an excellent shot with a rifle, and a great hunter and she brings in a lot of our me-"
    "You trust one of those things with a rifle!?" He exclaimed, flabbergasted.
    "Yes, because they're not things. They're people like us. And her name is Josie and she's a much better shot than I am. Another one, a moth named Alice, is an excellent piano player. I'd wager that if she weren't a slave, she could make a decent living playing up north. I've told her this, but she seems happy with me."
    "Mr. Galliano...what you're telling me, it's-it's practically unheard of here!"
    "I'm not so sure about that. But I suppose, if a man did own thousands of slaves, I suppose it's only natural to see them as just a commodity, just a number. But I know all five of the ones that live with me very well, and they're very important to me."
    John seemed to chew on that thought for a while. He scratched his chin, looking down at his beans as he thought of what he should say to me next, as if he wanted to counter what I was saying, but every time he thought of something, it wouldn't hold water.
    "Well, I suppose since they're yours I can't tell you what to do with 'em. And maybe you're onto to something Adrian. The bugs I own, I made sure to buy their whole families, as to not  disrupt them too much. And I have overheard them talk, how they want a better life for their children...I suppose that's something I can relate to."
    I smiled at that. Maybe John would start seeing things how I did. And maybe with my book, more Americans could see insect-anthros how I see them.
    After our meal concluded, we exchanged addresses to keep in touch, John said he wanted a copy of my book as soon as it was published. Although he might have been nothing more than a stranger before our lunch, I can say that now John Tavern was a friend.
 
 
 
 
Chapter XVI - Go With The Flow
 
November 9th, 1858
 
    Life seemed to finally be picking up for me since my 'incident' a few months back. After corresponding with my publisher through mail, I was able to get my book about my life here on the Folsom Estate edited, and ready to be published next month. I don't know what it is, but I finally feel like I'm...content. I love all of the women that I live with, I've got my work ready to be printed and put in stores, and, I've even made a friend in the portly bulldog gentleman John Tavern.
    In fact, I had invited John and his wife over for dinner in the evening. It was quite the event here, as I being an admittedly reclusive person, rarely liked having guests, even back when I lived in Italy.
    Currently, I'm helping set up the dinner table for their arrival with Shelly and Alice. When I brought up the idea of having him over as a guest, I was initially hesitant, and wasn't sure what the ladies all would think. But to my shock, all the girls looked forward to meeting his wife and him, even Josie did when I explained what he was like, that he was a little simple, but seemed to be a good fellow.
    After an hour or so of tidying the house up and awaiting the Tavern's arrival, I went back up to my room to get my best shirt and pants on. I looked at myself in the mirror, my hair had gotten longer than I would like, I'd need to ask Shelly again if she'd cut it for me. But I noticed in the mirror as it pointed back toward the balcony, a red buzzing figure coming toward me.
    I opened up the balcony doors as Josie descended to the floor, dressed in an elegant black dress, her short bob-cut hair curled. Simply put, she looked elegant. I gawked at her as she looked on at me, blushing. As amazing as Josie normally looked in her rugged, tomboyish manner, it was a nice change to see her dressed like a noblewoman.
    "Josie, I dunno how to put it other than...you look amazing." I said, my mouth agape and smiling as I appraised her figure up and down.
    "T-thanks...Esther helped me put the dress on a-and with my hair."
    "Yeah...Anyway, we should head down, the Tavern's will be here any minute and-"
    Suddenly, Josie brought my face close to hers, pulling me in for a deep kiss. It was sloppy, she lacked technique, but made up for it in raw passion. I grabbed onto her hand, locking my fingers into hers, enjoying the moment. As she pulled away, she became sheepish once more; not sure what to say to me.
    "Is that your way of saying that you're finally ready?" I asked half seriously.
    "Y-yes."
    "Well, as excited as I am, we got a dinner to host. C'mon." I smiled at her, and held out my hand. As she took it, we walked down the the two flights of stairs to the lobby, where John Tavern and his wife were at. We all exchanged pleasantries, and eventually made our way to the dinner table.
    John's wife, Lucinda, was almost the polar opposite of him. Where he was short, and fat, she was lanky and thin as a rail, even for a bulldog. But just like him, she was lovely.
    As well all enjoyed each other's company, I told stories of when I lived in Italy. Of how life over there differs from here in America, what kind of anthros live over there, and other kinds of conversation. All in all, it was an awesome autumn evening, spent in fellowship. John and Lucinda marveled at how the ladies of the estate acted. How they engaged them in conversations, and how they were just like them, people.
 
 
    As I reviewed the days events in my head, sitting on my balcony's chair, with a glass of scotch in hand, all I could do was smile. If I could change the lives of the ladies I loved by moving here, maybe I could change the lives for many other enslaved insects, and one day, they'd be free.
    My musings were interrupted by Josie once again, buzzing up to me from the farm. She wasn't in her dress anymore, instead, in her cutoff overalls, but didn't seem to be wearing a shirt underneath, giving me a nice view of her breasts and how they bunched up against thte straps of her overalls.
    She stood around for a second, unsure of herself, then propped herself in my lap, straddling me. I looked up at her, she was biting her lip and stared into my eyes, I could smell a similar sweet scent coming from her, like the one Minnie gave off the first time we went down to the pantry.
    I snaked my arms up to her neck, and wrapped them around her, slowly bringing her face closer towards mine. As we kissed once more, I took the lead, and pushed my tongue into her mouth. She froze at the gesture, but seemed to respond to it well, trying to wrap her tongue around mine. As our tongues danced in our mouths, I removed my hands from her neck, and caressed them downwards to her back, then her waist, and finally landing on her tight, athletic rear.
    I gave it a firm squeeze with each hand, causing Josie to moan into my mouth, stopping the dance of tongues momentarily. I then moved them further to her thighs that weren't covered by her overalls, feeling how her chitin contrasted against my soft hands.
    Then, I put one over her crotch, feeling how much warmer it was than the rest of her body. As I moved my hand up and down against it slowly, Josie took deep breaths, inhaling and exhaling as I moved my fingers against her covered vagina.
    We broke our kiss after a while, and I looked up into her eyes. She smiled at me, then moved her lips close to my ear, whispering.
    "I'm ready."
    That's all I needed to here. I moved my arms up to her shoulders, hooking them under her armpits, and brought us into my room. Josie wrapped her legs around my back for stability as I shut the balcony doors, and laid her gently onto my bed.
    She looked up at me seductively, her mouth half-open, and freed her body from the confines of her overalls.
    Josie splayed herself out on the bed, putting two arms behind her head, and her lower pair on her perky breasts. It was pretty obvious to me that she was not a master in the art of seduction, as her movements were awkward, and unsure of herself. But her effort was endearing, as I took off my pants and shirt to get ready for her.
    I hovered above Josie as I climbed into bed with her. Josie opened her legs slightly as I moved my body closer to hers. She grabbed onto my neck with her top arms for support, and held onto my hands with her bottom pair, squeezing tightly. I moved my head down to give her a reassuring peck on the lips, looking deeply into her eyes.
    Slowly, I moved my fully erect member to the entrance of Josie's now wet and engorged pussy. I massaged my cock against her lips, causing Josie's breath to become shallow. Slowly, I moved it into her vagina, holding her hands tightly as I pressed my hips closer to hers.
 She cried out a little as I plunged the head of my cock into her, but as she compensated for the feeling of something foreign in her, she relaxed, and I continued slowly sheathing my member into Josie.
    Her moans increased in volume as I bottomed out inside of her. Moving one of her arms to my back for support, but I held on to her tightly, letting her know I was there for her.
    Josie was starting to get more into it, moving her hips with mine, and kissing my face as I buried my cock in her. I picked up the tempo slightly, enjoying how her warm, slick pussy felt against my member. She now had three of her arms on my back, holding on tightly. I could feel fingers clawing into me, but I didn't mind, as I was lost in pleasure like Josie was.
    Her head fell back onto a pillow as I was now fucking her senseless. Moans became grunts as I thrust in and out of her.
    But through all of this, I held on tightly to Josie's hand, our fingers intertwined. I wouldn't let go of her.
    Pressure was building up all through my lower body. Josie was now incorrigible, totally lost in ecstasy as I piston away.
    With one final thrust, I put my body as close as I could to hers, hot white cum exploding from my cock, coating the insides of Josie's walls. She spasmed in pure bless as she came alongside me, her tongue now lolling outside her mouth as she hyperventilated, coming down from her own orgasm.
 
    I laid my head down next to Josie, pulling the bed sheets over us, sleep now calling to me post-coitus. It seemed Josie was already fast asleep, as I could hear her now stable breathing, her eyes closed. I gave her a little kiss on the forehead, and brought my head next to hers, as consciousness drifted from me. All the while, I still held onto Josie's hand, and gave it one final squeeze before sleep took me.
 
 
 
December 24th, 1858
 
    The last month has been busier than I would have liked it to be, but I suppose that happens when you write a book that takes an entire nation by storm. It seems every day was a dinner with a different intellectual or public figure that wanted to meet me personally, as well as the ladies. I'd been enumerated with letters from other plantation owners thanking me for being able to see insects as people just like us, finding that they're not mindless drones, even if they don't have skin or fur like a human or mammal anthro would. Even President Buchanan showed interest in visiting me, but our schedules conflicted and it would have to be done at another time.
    I was glad though that the past week had been winding down just in time for Christmas. It didn't snow at all on the estate, but Esther and Josie did take the spare rooms that weren't being used. Well, Esther took a spare room, and Josie slept with me most of the time. Not that I minded. Things seemed to be shaping up for the better...
 
*knock* *knock* *knock*
 
    Shelly opened my bedroom door, peeking her head in to look at me.
    "Adrian, Minnie made some eggnog, why dontcha come down, all the girls are huddled by the fireplace."
    "That sounds lovely, no reason to keep you all waiting." I said, getting up from my bed and walking along with Shelly down the stairs.
    "Adrian, I don't know how to put it other than...You've made living here so much more lively. Sure, it had its moments when your uncle ran the place. But, it really feels like a family now." Shelly said smiling down at me.
    In the parlor I saw Minnie passing out mugs full of warm eggnog, Alice playing Christmas tunes on the small parlor piano, and Esther and Josie laughing, enjoying each other's company on a chair by the fire. Watching the whole scene, with everyone in good spirits, I could do nothing but smile.
   
 
"Yeah, it feels good to have a family."
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Epilogue
 
April 16th, 1861
 
    "Adrian! You don't have to do this! What would you be proving by going off an' joining the army?"
    "I'd be proving that I'm willing to put my money where my mouth is. I wrote a whole goddamn book on why slavery is horrible, and how you all shouldn't be treated any differently than anyone else. Well, when half of the fucking country decides to leave because they DON'T want to give up owning slaves, then yes, I think I still have a point to prove. That I'm not a coward, that I'm not willing to just say something, I'm doing something about it."
    Shelly just looked at me sadly. I did feel bad for her, but this was a point of duty for me. When all of the southern states, including the one I resided in, declared they were seceding and forming their own country off the basis that they had the right to own other living beings, I knew I couldn't live here anymore. I had to move, or do something. Luckily I suppose, war was declared not too long ago by the Confederate States of America against the United States, the Union. The choice became pretty obvious to me then, and a month ago, I enlisted in the Union Army up in the Washington.
    "Please Adrian...can't you send someone in your place? You've got the money, you don't...you don't have to be a martyr...not for me, not for anyone."
    "I do Shelly. If you, and all the other enslaved insects can't make the choice to fight, then I will, I'll be your biggest supporter."
    "Adrian! I don't care about the politics, I don't care about any other bug, besides the ones that live with us! I care about you! I-I...I dunno how I'll be able to go on if you don't come back...doesn't that mean somethin'?" Shelly said, with tears streaming down her eyes. I knew this would happen, but I had to join. My mind was made up, and frankly, I didn't really have a choice. I wrote about why insect-anthros should have the same rights as every other American, I had to defend them to get those rights.
    I brought down my rucksack full of all the things I'd need before heading up to Washington, and brought Shelly into a long, big hug. She began sobbing as I did, and that almost made me want to change my mind, the thought that I couldn't be with the ladies any longer. But it wouldn't happen, I would be fighting for a righteous cause. I'd been in one war already, I could survive another.
    "I will come back. That's a promise that I will never ever break to you Shelly."
 
 
    The coach-buggy was ready outside of my estate. A stallion-anthro man put on his reigns as I threw my rucksack in the wagon. John Tavern was there as well, since he didn't live far from me, and since he was far too old to be enlisted, I asked him to watch over the estate, in case any fighting came here. John was my only friend in Virginia, and I knew I'd be keeping the property in good hands. Josie would as well, I gave her permission to shoot anyone in a grey uniform than came anywhere close to the estate.
    I sighed, and turned to all the ladies of the estate. There was a definite melancholic feel in the air. Minnie and Alice were fighting back tears, Esther gazed down at her dress, a prominent frown written on her face. Josie merely looked off to the side, probably afraid that if she looked at me she'd start crying as well.
    All of them practically piled on top of me in a mass group hug. Sending me there well wishes, telling me to write back often. And I would. I wouldn't break my promise.
 
I was coming back home.
 
 
 
 
 
 
September 17th, 1862
 
Antietam
 
    The scene was mayhem. As we flanked the Confederate's left side, they were more than ready on the defensive. We outnumbered them in terms of manpower, but they were resilient. I could hear the constant sounds of artillery and gunfire. Smoke, soot, sweat, and blood stank on the land. I was fighting with the Army of the Potomac, and because of my previous experience in Venice fourteen years prior, was immediately promoted to corporal. Although I was the oldest corporal in the corps, at thirty two years old, but made up for it in my knowledge and experience on the battlefield.
    Currently, my squadron was pinned behind a hill on Antietam creek. The Confederates had an artillery canon not far from there, and it was my job to take it out.  My men were busy defending our position, and so I rushed up to the top of the hill, my mind racing a mile a minute. I thought about Shelly, Minnie, Alice, Esther, and Josie. I had to remember I was fighting for them.
    I drew my rifle at the two men manning the canon, a fox anthro and a human. I shot first at the human, his head being replaced by a mist of red, as he fell. I unloaded the empty shell of my repeater, and aimed at his comrade next to him. Same result, his lifeless body collapsing as he fell.
    I stared at my handiwork for a second, then remembered to duck below the hill once more.
    Then suddenly, my hearing went away from me, I fell behind the hill like I had planned, but was suddenly tumbling down. I coughed, and blood came from my mouth, staining  the collar of my blue uniform. I couldn't see very well out of my left eye, it refused to open for some reason. My left arm also went numb, and as I finally landed at the bottom of the hill, I could faintly here my men yell for me.
 
Then everything went black.
 
 
 
 
 
 
May 28th, 1865
 
    The buggy suddenly came to a stop. As I looked up, I was back to a familiar sight. The black iron gates at the top read:
 
"GALLIANO"
 
I had gotten it changed from "Folsom" a year after moving. The man who had gotten out to open it, climbed back into the buggy, shutting the door. He wore the same Union blue uniform I did, as he was my captain in the Potomac Army. Though he was several years younger than me.
    "Adrian, you're finally home." He said, patting me the leg.
    "It's good to be home, Jack."
    "It's a shame about what happened to you back in Antietam, but you were able to follow with the rest of us all the way to Appomattox Court House, and I'll never forget that. You're a good soldier Adrian, but you're an even better man."
    As we got out at the front of the front of the house, Jack stood next to me, staring me in the eyes, and saluted me. I saluted him back, and pulled him in for a handshake and a hug.
    "Stay in touch, Jack." I said, smiling at him.
    "I will. Say hi to your ladies for me."
    "Oh I definitely will."
   
    Jack got back into the buggy, and began his trek off of the property. As I looked at the white marble house, I let out a large sigh, knowing I was finally home. I made sure to adjust my uniform so I made a good showing for the girls, and that my cap was on straight. My hair was totally unkempt; long, curly and messy. Fuzz covered my face, a sad excuse for a beard, but I had little time to shave on the battlefield.
Thinking that I'd be as ready as I'll ever be, I grabbed onto the large doorknocker, and pulled on it three times.
 
Opening the door was Shelly. Her hair was a lighter brown, now that she was a few years older, but she still looked as beautiful as ever.
    "I'm home." I said, giving as big a smile I could.
    Shelly immediately started sobbing, as she looked at my grizzled, war-worn visage. I held her tightly in a hug as she wept, I'm not sure if they were tears of joy, or sorrow, or a combination of the two. But what I did know was that after four long years, I was finally home.
    She weakly brought up a hand to my face, to my left eye. Or rather, the patch that covered my left eye, as it had to be removed after being shot in Antietam. I brought the four fingers of my left hand to her face, running it along her. When she felt that something was amiss, she grabbed onto my hand, trying to find my fifth finger. But it wasn't there, as it, along with part of my left hand, had been shot off as well. Her reaction to this was bawl even more, but I stayed there to comfort her. Lucky for me, these were the only serious injuries I'd sustained while fighting, along with getting shot in the left shoulder, but the bullet was able to be removed, and no other work had to be done on it. All in all, I got out lucky. I'd seen comrades have to get all their limbs amputated, get their heads blown off, die of dysentery.
 
    But I was the luckiest man in the world, as I was back with the five women I loved more than life itself. Minnie, Alice, Esther, and Josie, all gathered to where I was on the porch once they saw I was home. I didn't want to be anywhere else. I was with my family. I was happy.
 
 
 


I'm finally home.